<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89420-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-20-89.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 75 / Thursday, April 20, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Employment and Training Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">20 CFR Part 639</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Agency:</T2> Employment and Training Administration, Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Action:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Summary:</T2> The Employment and Training Administration of the Departmentof Labor is publishing a final regulation carrying out the provisions ofthe Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (WARN). WARN providesthat, with certain exceptions, employers of 100 or more workers must giveat least 60 days' advance notice of a plant closing or mass layoff to affectedworkers or their representatives, to the State dislocated worker unit,and to the appropriate local government.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Effective Date:</T2> May 22, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>For further information contact:</T2> Mr. Robert N. Colombo, Director,Office of Employment and Training Programs, Employment and Training Administration,Department of Labor, Room N4469, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20210. Telephone: (202) 535-0577.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Supplementary information:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Introduction</ITAG>The Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (WARN, the statute,or the Act), Pub. L. 100-379, 102 Stat. 890, was enacted on August 4, 1988.29 U.S.C. 2101 et seq. Section 11 of the Act provides that WARN goes intoeffect on February 4, 1989. WARN provides that, with certain exceptions,employers of 100 or more workers must give at least 60 days' advance noticeof a plant closing or mass layoff to affected workers or their representatives,to the State dislocated worker unit (see 29 U.S.C. 1661(b)(2)), and tothe appropriate local government. 29 U.S.C. 2902 and 2903. Section 8(a)of the Act requires that the Secretary of Labor ``prescribe such regulationsas may be necessary to carry out this Act. Such regulations shall, at aminimum, include interpretative regulations describing the method by whichemployers may provide for appropriate service of notice as required bythis Act.'' 29 U.S.C. 2107(a). Under section 11 of the Act, the authorityto issue regulations for WARN became effective on August 4, 1988.The Employment and Training Administration (ETA) of the Department of Labor(DOL or Department), since the enactment of WARN, has published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> for comment various notices, a discussion paper,an interim interpretative rule and a proposed rule on WARN. 53 FR 34844(September 8, 1988); 53 FR 36056 (September 16, 1988); 53 FR 38026 (September29, 1988); 53 FR 39403 (October 6, 1988); 53 FR 43731 (October 28, 1988);53 FR 48884 (December 2, 1988); and 53 FR 49076 (December 5, 1988). Afterfull consideration of public comments received in response to the notices,discussion paper, interim interpretative rule and proposed rule, ETA ispublishing this final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Prior Actions</ITAG>On September 16, 1988, the Department published a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> inviting comments from interested parties regarding:``(1) The extent to which the Department should issue interpretive regulations;and (2) To the extent that regulations are needed, the specific views ofcommenters on how particular sections of the law should be implementedthrough regulations.''A total of 63 letters was received from employer associations, companies,law firms, unions, employee associations, Members of Congress, State officials,and a private citizen. Commenters strongly encouraged DOL to publish regulationsto explain how WARN would be implemented and to clarify WARN provisionsthey found ambiguous. Commenters also requested that DOL address a numberof specific items and define particular terms.On October 28, 1988, the Department published the WARN Discussion Paperin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and solicited comments. This paper reviewed sections2, 3, 4, and 11 of the statute, discussing questions raised in commentson the September 16, 1988 Notice and issues addressed in the legislativehistory.DOL received 62 comment letters in response to the October 28 DiscussionPaper from employer associations, employers, labor unions, law firms, aState governmental agency, four members of Congress who were legislativesponsors, and another member of Congress. Commenters generally expressedagreement with the scope of the issues presented and many of the tentativepositions covered in the Discussion Paper. Commenters did raise specificpoints of disagreement, posed additional questions, sought informationabout the application of WARN in specific situations, and provided examples.On December 2, 1988 and December 5, 1988, the Department published an interiminterpretative rule effective through April 1, 1989, and a proposed rule,respectively, implementing the provisions of WARN and soliciting comments(these documents will be referred to as the proposed rule or regulation).53 FR 48884 and 53 FR 49076. The rules were identical. In their preambles,the Department discussed issues under the Act and comments received inresponse to the October 28, 1988 Discussion Paper. DOL received 82 lettersof comment on the interim interpretative and proposed rules from employerassociations, employers, labor unions, City governments, government interestgroups, professional associations, four members of Congress who were legislativesponsors, a municipal utility and a Federal agency. The comments were fullyconsidered, along with the written comments on the September 16, 1988 Noticeand the October 28, 1988 Discussion Paper, in ETA's development of thisfinal rule. The comments are discussed at considerable length in orderto make clear the Department's interpretation of WARN through these finalregulations and of their application to some of the problems that may arisein implementing the Act. At various points in this preamble the Department,in response to comments, has provided advice to employers on methods bywhich WARN liability may be avoided. This advice is for guidance only andshould not be interpreted to impose any new or additional standards orrequirements on employers.<ITAG tagnum="84">Analysis of Final Rule and Comments</ITAG>(1) General Issues<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Organization of Regulations</ITAG>The Department has written and presented the WARN regulations so they willbe understandable, and offer guidance to readers in the business and laborcommunities. Issues are discussed in their logical sequence, in an effortto easily convey the intent of the Act and employers' responsibilities.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Scope and Purpose</ITAG>These regulations cover sections 2, 3, and 4 of the Worker Adjustment andRetraining Notification Act. Section 2 of the Act provides necessary definitionsand exclusions. Section 3 creates the notice requirement, describes theservice of notice, sets forth the legal bases for providing reduced notice,provides for the extension of a layoff period, and specifies the considerationof employment losses over a 90-day period in determining whether some employersare covered by WARN requirements. Section 4 outlines two exemptions tocoverage of plant closings and mass layoffs.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) General Comments</ITAG>A commenter suggested that the final regulations should only deal withwhat WARN requires, not what the Department encourages. In developing thesefinal regulations, DOL has attempted to faithfully follow the languageand intent of WARN. The Department also has been aware that some of theprovisions of WARN may be ambiguous. In an effort to assist the publicin avoiding unintentional noncompliance, DOL has tried to point out potentialproblems and in some cases has suggested methods of compliance.A commenter suggested that DOL should not regard the comments of four ofthe Congressional sponsors, who commented both on the Discussion Paperand on the proposed regulations, as legislative history and should disregardthose comments. The Department agrees that these comments do not have theforce of legislative history. On the other hand, there is no reason todisregard them. They have been treated as any other comments.A commenter suggested that the final regulations should contain specificcitations to the legislative history for clarity and to preclude litigation.DOL agrees that citations may be useful and has provided them.(2) Section 639.1 Purpose and Scope<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.1(a) Purpose of WARN</ITAG>This section gives a brief overview of the purpose of the Act. None ofthe comments discussed this provision and it remains unchanged in the finalregulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.1(b) Scope of These Regulations</ITAG>This section discusses the Department's intent in developing these regulations.None of the comments discussed this provision and it remains unchangedin the final regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) Section 639.1(c) Notice Encouraged Where Not Required</ITAG>This section quotes the statutory provision reflecting the intent of Congressthat notice be provided even where not required by WARN. None of the commentsdiscussed this provision and it remains unchanged in the final regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">(d) Section 639.1(d) WARN Enforcement</ITAG>This provision discusses the WARN enforcement scheme. Commenters suggestedthat the regulations should include interpretations of several of the provisionsof andSection;5 of WARN, which contains the enforcement provisions. Specifically,it was suggested that the regulations should discuss the ``buy-out'' provisionsof sections 5(a) (2) and (3), which provide that an employer may reduceits monetary liability for violations of WARN by the amounts of certainpayments made to or on behalf of the affected workers. One of the commentersalso suggested that the regulations should discuss the basis for calculatingthe amount of monetary liability and should distinguish between violationsof the Act from failure to give notice and violations for giving noticein a ``technically deficient fashion''.The Department believes that in the unique WARN enforcement scheme, underwhich all enforcement will occur in the context of private civil lawsuits,it is inappropriate for the Department to regulate with respect to theseissues. These matters have been left solely to the courts to decide.The Department generally agrees with the comment that technical violationsof the notice requirements not intended to evade the purposes of WARN oughtto be treated differently than either the failure to give notice or thegiving of notice intended to evade the purposes of the Act. The final regulations,in andSection;639.7(a)(3), include language to make it clear that inadvertenterrors and factual errors which occur because of subsequent changes inevents are not intended to be violations of the regulations. Other kindsof violations, i.e., the failure to provide information required in theseregulations, may constitute a violation of WARN.The proposal referred to these rules as interpretative regulations. Uponre-evaluation, this reference has been eliminated in the final regulation.The final regulation reflects the Department's careful consideration ofthe issues raised in this rulemaking and extensive analysis of the numerouscomments it has received.<ITAG tagnum="81">(e) Section 639.1(e) Notice in Ambiguous Situations </ITAG>This section discusses the desirability of giving notice in situationswhere questions may arise about the applicability of WARN. While no commentswere received which directly discussed this provision, DOL has receivednumerous comments and questions which illustrate the principle of thisprovision and demonstrate the existence of a possible source of confusionfor some employers. These comments inquire about whether or not an employerplanning a plant closing or mass layoff is covered because of some eventswhich may occur between the date that notice is required to be given andthe date of the event. An example of a typical inquiry is: an employeris planning to close a unit which employs 55 people; the employer willsubsequently offer early retirement incentives to some of these employees,six of whom accept the early retirements before the termination occurs;since only 49 workers will finally be terminated is there a covered plantclosing? Technically, the correct answer may be that no covered plant closingwill have occurred (assuming, of course, that other actions within the30- or 90-day aggregation periods provided in WARN do not trigger coverage).However, an employer has to make a decision on whether or not to give noticebased on what it <T3>knows </T3>60 or more days before the plant closing or mass layoffwill occur. If, as in this example, at the time the decision to give noticehas to be made, the employer is not certain that its early retirement incentiveswill be accepted or how many workers will accept early retirement, theemployer is best advised to give notice. If the employer ``gambles'' thata sufficient number of employees will accept the offer and ``loses', theemployer's cost will be 60 days' pay and benefits to at least 50 workers.If the employer gives notice, the cost will be the cost of preparing andmailing 55 notices. Given the relative costs involved, the employer isbest advised to give notice unless it is <T3>certain, at the time it must decide to give notice, </T3>that thereis no possibility of coverage. Because of this possible source of confusion, DOL has strengthened thelanguage of this recommendation. <ITAG tagnum="81">(f) Section 639.1(f) Coordination With Job Placement and RetrainingPrograms</ITAG>This provision discusses coordination with other DOL programs aimed atproviding assistance to dislocated workers. None of the comments discussedthis provision and it remains unchanged in the final regulations. <ITAG tagnum="81">(g) Section 639.1(g) WARN Not to Supersede Other Laws and Contracts</ITAG>This provision discusses the requirement of andSection; 6 of WARN that theprovisions of the Act ``are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any othercontractual and statutory rights of the employees''. In the preamble tothe proposed regulations, DOL solicited comments on: (1) Whether and towhat extent the final regulations might provide that collective bargainingagreements which provide for terms different from the terms incorporatedinto the WARN regulations may be used as legitimate alternative methodsof Compliance with WARN; and (2) whether such a provision should applyonly to collective bargaining agreements that are entered into after theeffective date of WARN or whether agreements that predate WARN also shouldbe included. DOL received a number of comments on this issue. Some commenterssupported broad application of collective bargaining agreements to definethe terms of WARN. Other commenters opposed any application of collectivebargaining agreements to alter or modify the provisions of WARN. After considering comments received, the Department concludes that theWARN requirements stand by themselves and cannot be set aside in favorof collective bargaining agreements, regardless of whether such agreementswere entered into before or after the effective date of WARN. However,where collective bargaining agreements include provisions which are consistentwith and not inferior to WARN requirements, application of those provisionsto further define or clarify WARN terms in a specific context would satisfyWARN. For example, WARN requires that notice of a mass layoff be providedat least 60 days in advance to affected employees or their representatives,to the State dislocated worker unit, and to a unit of local government.If a collective bargaining agreement provides for an employer to issuewritten notice to the union representing the affected workers 10 days priorto an anticipated layoff, this provision will not satisfy the WARN requirementsfor 60-day advance notice to the union representing the workers. But ifthe contract provides for an employer to issue written notice to the union75 days in advance of anticipated layoffs, that provision will satisfythe WARN requirement for 60-day advance notice. The Department also recognizes that certain of the provisions of WARN involvessubjects which are typically covered in collective bargaining agreements.For example, the definition of the term ``operating unit'' depends on theorganizational and functional structure of each plant, a matter often coveredunder seniority or other provisions of collective bargaining agreements.Similarly, WARN provides that a worker does not experience an employmentloss if the employer offers to transfer the worker to a job at a differentsite within a reasonable commuting distance. The definition of the term``reasonable commuting distance'' is a flexible one intended to take localconditions into consideration. If a collective bargaining agreement includesprovisions for transfers and stipulates what constitutes reasonable commutingdistance, that definition should control; it is the parties' agreementon the meaning of the term in the local conditions. Also, the collectivebargaining agreements often will help in defining whether certain of theexceptions to the general definition of ``single site of employment'' areapplicable. (3) <T3>Section 639.2 What Does WARN require? </T3>This section provides a brief overview of the WARN notice scheme. Noneof the comments discussed this provision and it remains unchanged in thefinal regulations.(4) Section 639.2 Definitions<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.3(a) Definition of ``Employer''</ITAG>This provision provides a definition of the term ``employer''. It repeatsthe statutory definition of the size threshold for coverage under WARNas an employer and specifies which workers are counted in making coveragedeterminations; it makes it clear that private nonprofit organizations,as well as for-profit entities, are covered; it discusses the status ofindependent contractors and subsidiaries as separate employers; and itclarifies that an employer is defined in terms of the overall corporateor business entity, not in terms of any particular plant. In the preamble to the proposed regulations, DOL requested comments onwhether agencies of State and local government which are independent andperform business activities should be covered. Several commenters opposedinclusion of these entities, arguing that the statutory definition of employeras a ``business enterprise'' is inapplicable to government agencies, thatthe tax payment test for notice to local governments is inapplicable toagencies of local government and that any definition would sweep too broadlyand include school boards and similar entities. Other commenters supportedinclusion as consistent with the intent of WARN to broadly protect workersagainst dislocation. Because of the use of the term ``business enterprise'',DOL concludes that regular Federal, State, and local government publicagencies and services are outside the purview of WARN. For completeness,federally recognized Indian tribal governments have also been added tothe list of governments not covered by WARN. The legislative history isnot helpful on the specific question of coverage of public and quasi-publicbusiness enterprises. DOL agrees that the underlying intent of WARN isworker protection. Given the nature and the language of the law, DOL concludesthat the term ``business enterprise'' used in the statute includes publicand quasi-public entities which engage in business (i.e., take part ina commercial or industrial enterprise; supply a service or good on a mercantilebasis, or provide independent management of public assets, raising revenueand making desired investments). Whether a particular public or quasi-publicentity is covered will be determined by the functional test described aboveand by an organizational test, i.e., whether the entity is managed by aseparately organized governing body with independent authority to manageits personnel and assets. It should be noted that DOL has not defined coveredpublic enterprises in terms of the traditional/non-traditional governmentalfunctions distinction that was rejected by the Supreme Court as unworkablein <T3>Garcia </T3>v. <T3>San Antonio Metropolitan Transit Authority, </T3>469 U.S. 528 (1984).The test that has been adopted is intended to be a relatively precise onethat will include such entities as regional transportation authoritiesand independent municipal utilities, but will exclude such organizationsas school boards. Several commenters pointed out that the phrase in andSection;639.3(a)(1), defining additional workers who are counted in determiningwhether an employer meets the coverage threshold, ``[w]orkers on temporarylayoff who have a reasonable expectation of recall'' needs further definition.Particularly, commenters from the construction industry pointed out thatwhen construction crafts workers are laid off at the end of a project,they expect to be reemployed within the construction industry, but notnecessarily with the same employer. DOL agrees with the commenters thatfurther definition of the phrase is appropriate and has added a definition.A worker is considered to have a ``reasonable expectation of recall'' ifthe worker ``understands, either through notification or industry practice,that his/her employment with the employer has been temporarily interruptedand that he/she will be recalled to the same or a similar job.'' This definition,derived from case law under the National Labor Relations Act (NLRA), isintended to cover those situations in which, for a variety of reasons,workers are laid off with the understanding that they will be called backat a later date. The definition is intended to be applied in accordancewith the case law developed under the NLRA. Another commenter suggested that the regulations should define the statusof workers who are on leave from their employers. DOL thinks that the samerules apply to these workers as apply to workers in layoff status, thatis, whether workers on leave from an employer understand that their leavestatus constitutes a temporary interruption of their job and that theyhave rights upon the conclusion of their leave to return to the same ora substantially similar job with the employer. Language has been addedin andSection; 639.3(a)(1) to include workers on leave within the categoryof workers who may be counted for determining the coverage thresholds forthe definition of employer. Several commenters raised questions about the definition of ``[i]ndependentcontractors and subsidiaries'' in andSection; 639.3(a)(2). Some of thesecommenters suggested that the definition should be simplified to treatsubsidiaries as separate employers as long as they are ``bona fide separateand distinct companies and hold themselves out to the public as such'';or to define as separate companies entities that have separate payrollfunctions. One commenter requested special treatment for the garment industrybecause of the peculiar relationship of jobbers and contractors withinthat industry. Another commenter suggested that the regulation also shouldrecognize the doctrine of joint employer status, as that doctrine has beendeveloped under the NLRA. A commenter suggested that the National MediationBoard should be recognized as the authority for determining whether companiescovered by the Railway Labor Act (RLA) are separate. Another commenterstated that the rule on subsidiaries also should apply to operating divisions.The intent of the regulatory provision relating to independent contractorsand subsidiaries is not to create a special definition of these terms forWARN purposes; the definition is intended only to summarize existing lawthat has developed under State Corporations laws and such statutes as theNLRA, the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) and the Employee Retirement IncomeSecurity Act (ERISA). The Department does not believe that there is anyreason to attempt to create new law in this area especially for WARN purposeswhen relevant concepts of State and federal law adequately cover the issue.Thus, no change has been made in the definition. Similarly, the regulationis not intended to foreclose any application of existing law or to identifythe source of legal authority for making determinations of whether relatedentities are separate. To the extent that existing law recognizes the jointemployer doctrine or the special situation of the garment industry, nothingin the regulation prevents application of that law. Nor does the regulationpreclude recognition of the National Mediation Board as an authoritativedecision maker for entities covered under the RLA. Neither does the regulationpreclude treatment of operating divisions as separate entities if suchdivisions could be so defined under existing law. A commenter suggested that the regulations be clarified to reflect thatif a business loses a contract, it is not responsible for employment lossesthat occur if the successor contractor fails. DOL agrees with the comment,but believes that the proposition state is axiomatic in the WARN scheme;an employer is only responsible for giving notice to its employees forcovered employment losses that occur as a result of its actions. The Departmentdoes not believe that any clarification of the regulations is needed. A question has been raised whether temporary employees are to be countedwhen determining whether an employer is covered under WARN. The Departmentnotes that there is no exception for temporary employees (or more accurately,for employees working on temporary projects or in temporary facilities)in the definition of employer in the law; the only category of workersnot counted in determining coverage is part-time employees, as definedin the statute. In determining employer coverage, therefore, temporaryemployees are counted unless they are part-time employees. Of course, whilean employer may be covered by virtue of employing a sufficient number oftemporary_but not part-time_workers, the employer may be exempt from anyrequirement to give these employees notice if they are working in a temporaryfacility, or on a temporary project or undertaking, as defined in andSection;4(a) of the Act and andSection; 639.5(c) of these regulations.The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) specifically commented on theapplication of WARN to its activities and those of the Federal Savingsand Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) in the current savings and loan(S andamp; L) banking crisis. FHLBB argues that, because of its statutorymandate, it should not be considered an employer when it or the FSLIC closesa bank. The Department agrees that under the statutory scheme of the depositinsurance laws, neither the Board nor the FSLIC, which are exercising strictlygovernmental authority in ordering the closing, are to be considered asemployers.Another commenter suggested that ``fiduciaries'' in bankruptcy proceedingsshould be excluded from the definition of employer. Since adequate protectionsfor fiduciaries are available through the bankruptcy courts, the Departmentdoes not think it appropriate to change the regulations to address thissituation. Further, DOL agrees that a fiduciary whose sole function inthe bankruptcy process is to liquidate a failed business for the benefitof creditors does not succeed to the notice obligations of the former employerbecause the fiduciary is not operating a ``business enterprise'' in thenormal commercial sense. In other situations, where the fiduciary may continueto operate the business for the benefit of creditors, the fiduciary wouldsucceed to the WARN obligations of the employer precisely because the fiduciarycontinues the business in operation.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.3(b) Definition of ``Plant Closing''</ITAG>This section closely replicates the statutory definition of the term ``plantclosing'' and applies the definition to other WARN requirements. Therewere few comments on the regulatory language itself, and they supportedthe approach taken.A comment made in the preamble to the proposed regulation, suggesting thata plant closing occurs only where the threshold number of workers are terminatedor laid off as a direct result of one or more plant closings, did, however,draw considerable comment. A number of commenters supported this interpretation.Several commenters opposed it, pointing to the structure of the statutorylanguage. DOL has revisited this issue and has decided to revise its earlierposition. Section 2(a) (2) of WARN defines plant closing as ``the permanentor temporary shutdown of * * * one or more facilities or operating units* * * if the shutdown results in an employment loss during any 30-day periodfor 50 or more employees * * *.'' This language, particularly the use ofthe words ``results in'', contemplates that both employment losses of theemployees who work in the facility(s) or operating unit(s) and those wholose their jobs as the direct result of the shutdown(s) are to be countedin determining when a plant closing has occurred. Thus, for example, ifthe 45 worker computer data entry department at a plant is closed and,<T3>as a direct result of that closing,</T3> (and within 30 days of theclosing), 5 computer programmers also are terminated, a covered plant closinghas occurred.Another commenter suggested that a series of closings or layoffs shouldbe considered a plant closing or mass layoff ``only if each stems fromthe same business decision, personnel action, or other distinct cause'';where no distinct cause accounts for a threshold number of employment lossesthere is no WARN coverage. DOL disagrees with this interpretation. WARNSection 2(a)(2) and (3) say nothing about cause. Under the language ofthose provisions, one merely counts up all the employment losses that occurin a 30-day period to determine coverage.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) Section 639.3(c) Definition of ``Mass Layoff''</ITAG>This section closely follows the statutory language defining the term ``masslayoff'' and contrasts plant closings and mass layoffs. In reviewing thelanguage of the regulation, DOL has determined that the insertion of thephrase ``which can be triggered by the termination of a smaller numberof workers than a mass layoff'' in the description of a plant closing,is technically incorrect, and, therefore, that phrase has been removed.Both mass layoffs and plant closings can be triggered by the layoff ortermination of 50 workers. In the case of a mass layoff of less than 500workers, however, coverage only will be triggered if the number of workersterminated is equal to 33 percent of the total number of workers at thesingle site of employment. Thus, the termination of 50 affected workersdoes not automatically lead to coverage as it does in the case of a plantclosing.One commenter noted that the legislative history of WARN makes it clearthat only employees who are actively working for the employer at the singlesite of employment as of the time of the layoff are to be considered indetermining whether the one-third threshold is met. Remarks to this effectwere made by Sen. Metzenbaum, the Senate floor manager of the bill. (133CONG. REC. S9488 (daily ed. July 9, 1987) (remarks of Sen. Metzenbaum)).Since the statutory language can be read to include only active employeesand since no contrary interpretation has been discovered, the regulationhas been revised accordingly. The Department believes that ``actively working''employees refers to those currently on the payroll and in pay status asof the time of the mass layoff.Another commenter suggested that the phrase ``or the entire site'' be addedat the end of the third sentence of the section. The Department agreesthat this change more closely conforms to the statutory language and hasadded the phrase. A commenter suggested that the regulations should make it clear that part-timeworkers are not counted in determining mass layoff or plant closing thresholds.While this is a correct statement, the regulations adequately address theissue. For reasons already discussed, language has been added in the finalregulations to clarify that workers on temporary projects or in temporaryfacilities who do not meet the definition of part-time workers are countedfor purposes of determining whether covered plant closing or mass layoffcoverage thresholds have been met. <ITAG tagnum="81">(d) Section 639.3(d) Definition of ``Representative'' </ITAG>This section quotes the definition of the term representative as it appearsin section 2(a)(4) of WARN. The comments supported this use of the definitionand no change has been made in the final regulations. <ITAG tagnum="81">(e) Section 639.3(e) Definition of ``Affected employees'' </ITAG>This section quotes the statutory definition of the term ``affected employees'':``employees who may reasonably be expected to experience an employmentloss as a consequence of a proposed plant closing or mass layoff''; anddiscusses specific applications of the term to certain classes of employees,including ``bumpees'', managerial and supervisory employees and employeesof independent contractors. It also indicates a rule for determining thenumber of affected employees for purposes of determining coverage thresholds.The purpose of WARN, to provide notice to workers so alternative employmentor necessary training can be obtained on a timely basis, applies to white-collarand managerial employees as well as to employees in the skilled tradesand other blue-collar occupations. Therefore, the Department includes managerialand supervisory workers as ``affected employees''. This provision drew a number of comments. A substantial number of commentersopposed any requirement of notice to ``bumpees'', that is, to workers wholose their jobs as a result of the exercise by an employee whose positionhas been eliminated (or by other more senior workers who have previouslybeen bumped) of seniority or bumping rights established by a senioritysystem. Most of these commenters pointed out the complexity of many senioritysystems and the difficulty of accurately predicting 60 days in advancewhich workers will actually lose their jobs. It was also pointed out thatrequiring notice to bumpees could lead to overbroad notice, which Congressclearly condemned. These commenters suggested that notice to incumbentsin the positions to be eliminated satisfies the Act (although one of thesecommenters also suggested that it is extremely difficult to identify incumbents60 days in advance). Some commenters suggested alternative notice to bumpees;either general notice to all potentially affected workers, some kind ofdifferent notice to bumpees, or specific notice to bumpees as soon as theyare identified. One commenter supported notice to bumpees but opposed any requirement thatnotice to bumpees be given only ``to the extent that such workers can beidentified at the time notice is required to be given.'' The commenterargued that section 3(b)(3) of WARN requires employers to give affectedemployees ``as much notice as practicable''. Most of the comments discuss collectively bargained seniority systems underwhich the identification problems suggested in the comments will not arisesince employers are required only to notify the affected unions and toprovide them with information about the positions affected and the incumbentsin those positions, not about the ultimate ``bumpees''. More fundamentally,the commenters' position on this issue, as it may apply to non-bargainedseniority systems, directly conflicts with the plain language of WARN.Section 2(a)(5) of the Act defines ``affected employees'' (in non-unionsituations, the persons entitled to WARN notice) as ``employees who <T3>may reasonably be expected </T3>to experience an employment loss''.The plain meaning of this language is that notice must be given to thoseworkers who will actually lose their jobs, to the extent they can reasonablybe identified. Only if the workers who will lose their jobs cannot be reasonablyidentified is notice to incumbents sufficient. DOL recognizes that, in cases of non-bargained, employer-developed seniorityor bumping systems, there are real complexities which militate againstimposing an absolute requirement that notice be given to all potentiallyaffected employees. DOL is persuaded that there are factors, includingthe difficulty of predicting a bumping path where employees have severaloptions among positions or lines of progression into which they can bump,which make it difficult to predict who will finally be affected as a resultof a plant closing or mass layoff. Nonetheless, DOL is constrained by thestatutory language to provide for notice to bumpees. The final regulationsprovide some flexibility by providing that notice need only be given toindividual workers who can reasonably be identified at the time noticeis required to be given. This section and andSection; 639.6(b) have beenrevised to clarify these principles. In addition, the Department recommends that notice be given to bumpeeswho are not given the full 60 days' notice as soon as they are identified.Such notice, while not required, would tend to show good faith compliance.The Department does not agree that section 3(b)(3) of WARN provides authorityfor a separate requirement that notice be given to bumpees as soon as theyare identified since that provision applies only to situations in whichone of the three bases for providing less than 60 days' notice is invoked.To some extent, it is true that broad notice may be the prudent coursein cases where complex seniority systems exist, but the concerns raisedby some commenters on this score appear to be overstated. Notice is notrequired to be given to intermediate bumpees in situations in which multiplebumps will occur. If an employee who has available bumping or seniorityrights refuses to exercise those rights and quits or resigns instead, thatemployee has voluntarily quit, has not suffered an employment loss andis not entitled to notice. Therefore, an employer need only provide noticeto two classes of workers: to those workers who are likely to actuallylose their jobs taking into consideration the probability that bumpingrights will be exercised, and to incumbents in the positions to be eliminated,in cases where it is not possible 60 days in advance of the covered eventto identify the ultimate bumpees. Although the complexities of identifyingthese ultimate bumpees may still exist, the group of workers to whom noticemust be given is considerably smaller than some commenters appear to think.A commenter suggested that the regulations should be clear that the numberby which to measure whether the plant closing or mass layoff thresholdhas been met is the number of employment losses that actually occur, ifthat number is less than the number of positions eliminated. While theDepartment agrees that this statement is correct and has revised the languageof this section to reflect this interpretation, it is important to pointout that, from a practical point of view, the number on which an employermust focus, in determining whether to give notice, is the number of potentialemployment losses which can be determined 65 days \1\<NOTE/> before the closing or layoff is to occur, the time at whichthe decision to give notice must be made. As the same commenter stressedrepeatedly in other comments, it is often difficult to predict 65 daysin advance exactly how many employment losses will actually occur. Thus,an employer faced with a decision about whether to give notice may be welladvised to base its decision on the number of positions to be eliminated,which is a known fact at the relevant time. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The figure of 65 days is used as an approximation of thenumber of days it will take to identify workers and to prepare and servenotices 60 days in advance of a planned action. Commenters raised the question whether notice extends to bumpees who maybe bumped at other employment sites (to the extent that they can be identifiedwhen notice is required to be given). DOL interprets the definition ofaffected employees to include such workers, who are, therefore, entitledto receive notice. It should be noted, however, that workers who sufferan employment loss at another single site of employment are not countedin determining whether plant closing or mass layoff coverage thresholdsare met. (DOL notes again the caution that the employer must evaluate thefacts as they appear when it must make its decision to give notice.) Thus,if an employer closes an operating unit which employs 55 workers and, becauseof crossplant bumping rights, 6 workers at another site lose their jobs,(and if these facts can be accurately predicted 65 days in advance of theclosing date) the plant closing threshold has not been met at the firstsite. It is also possible that an employment action that affects largenumbers of workers may trigger a second covered action at a separate siteif enough workers lose their jobs through cross-plant bumping. A commenter suggested that ``the regulations should specify that consultantor contract employees employed by another employer or self-employed arenot counted toward the threshold for determining employer coverage.'' DOLagrees with this proposition, as long as the separate employment relationshipis established under existing legal rules. It is specifically covered insection 639.3(e). <ITAG tagnum="81">(f) Section 639.3(f) Definition of ``Employment Loss'' </ITAG>This section defines ``employment loss'' and exclusions from employmentloss when certain transfers occur. These definitions closely follow thelanguage of the statute. The proposed regulation provided that workerswho retained ``full employment status'' could be reassigned without sufferingemployment loss. The Department notes that it interprets the statutoryterms ``termination'' and ``layoff'' in section 3(a)(6) to be distinguishableand to have their common sense meanings. Thus, for the purposes of defining``employment loss'', the term ``termination'' means the permanent cessationof the employment relationship and the term ``layoff'' means the temporarycessation of that relationship. A number of commenters questioned the use of the term ``full employmentstatus'' in section 639.3(f)(2). They argued that this concept, if broadlyapplied to mean that an employee can be reassigned only if he/she retainsfull pay and benefits, is inconsistent with the statutory definition ofemployment loss and with employers' rights to reassign workers. The intent of the ``full employment status'' language was to deal witha specific comment from a major employer which has a program for movingworkers who are to be terminated or laid off for a long time into job-findingor retraining activities, all at full pay and benefits. The ``full employmentstatus'' language was an attempt to distinguish this kind of program, inwhich an employee is not working at his old job but is retained on thepayroll, and does not experience an employment loss, from other kinds ofseverance pay or supplemental unemployment benefits (SUB) programs whichoccur after the end of the job and do not postpone the date of the employmentloss. DOL recognizes that the comments have merit and that the ``full employmentstatus'' concept is capable of overbroad application. The regulations havebeen revised to delete the concept but to retain language encouraging thekinds of employer-sponsored retraining programs for which the full employmentstatus concept was developed. It must be noted that the ability to reassign workers is not without limits.An employer may not vary the terms of a worker's assignment so much asto constructively discharge (as discussed in greater detail below) theemployee. Language to this effect has been added to the regulation.The question also has been raised as to whether an employment loss occursif an employee retains full pay and benefits and other entitlements butis not required to report to work. DOL notes that neither WARN nor theregulations dictate the nature of work to be performed_or whether workmust be performed_during a period of employment after notice of an impendingplant closing or mass layoff has been given. However, WARN does not replaceor alter any other contractual or statutory rights and remedies of employees,and other contracts or statutes may be applicable when employers considerreassignments or assignment to non-work status after giving notice in advanceof plant closings or mass layoffs. Several commenters requested further definition of what constitutes a ``voluntarydeparture, or retirement'', which are excluded from the definition of employmentloss. One commenter suggested that ``incentive programs'' should be specificallyrecognized as voluntary departures. Another commenter suggested that employeeswho are offered transfers to another employment site and who refuse thoseoffers should be considered to have voluntarily quit. Other commenterssuggested that ``voluntary layoffs'', that is, layoffs provided for incertain collective bargaining agreements under which more senior workersmay accept a layoff in return for certain SUB or other benefits shouldbe excluded from the definition of employment loss. Other commenters disagreedand suggested that workers who retire or quit in the face of an impendingtermination should not be treated as having voluntarily departed. DOL agrees with the commenters that some clarification of the concept ofvoluntary departures is appropriate. The concept is not a new one in thelaw; there is a developed body of law under such statutes as the NLRA,Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act and the Age Discrimination in EmploymentAct. This body of law recognizes the concept of constructive discharge,under which a worker's resignation or retirement may be found not to bevoluntary if the employer has created a hostile or intolerable work environmentor has applied other forms of pressure or coercion which forced the employeeto quit or resign. Similarly, acceptance of incentive programs, particularlyincentive retirement programs, can be found to be involuntary where a workerwas unduly pressured to accept the program. The regulations have been revisedto include this concept. Since the law in this area is well developed,the regulations do not attempt to specifically define the parameters ofvoluntariness, but merely refer to the existing legal concepts. In terms of the specific issues raised in the comments, the Departmentagrees that incentive programs, including incentive retirement programsand voluntary layoffs, that meet the definition of voluntariness outlinedabove, are voluntary departures for purposes of WARN. DOL does not, however,agree that a worker who, after the announcement of a plant closing or masslayoff, decides to leave early has necessarily been constructively dischargedor quit ``involuntarily''. (In the situation posted, where the plant closingor mass layoff has been announced, and, presumably, notice has been given,the worker already has received the notice that WARN requires and whetherhis later resignation or retirement is voluntary or not is no longer germane.)The comment about workers who quit when offered a transfer involves anotherprovision of WARN (section 2(b)(2)) which defines exclusions from employmentloss. Under that section, which will be discussed in greater detail below,the basic rule is that if, as a part of a relocation or consolidation ofall or part of an employer's business, a worker is offered a transfer withina reasonable commuting distance, the worker is not considered to have sufferedan employment loss whether or not the worker declines the transfer. Thereis no requirement for acceptance of the offer in this situation and, unlessthe offer itself may be deemed to be a constructive discharge, the offerof the transfer itself means that the worker is not deemed to suffer anemployment loss. On the other hand, if the transfer is beyond a reasonablecommuting distance, WARN requires that the employee accept the transferand refusal to accept means that the employee has suffered an employmentloss. If the transfer is not covered under these provisions, because notoffered as a result of a relocation or consolidation, a technical employmentloss occurs. If an employer offers to transfer a worker in this situationand if the worker accepts, the employer may still wish to provide noticeas additional protection from liability. Several commenters suggested that the regulations incorporate a conceptof ``net employment loss'' to cover situations in which an employer laysoff one group of workers and simultaneously hires another group to workon a different aspect of the same task or project. Other commenters suggestedthat the definition of employment loss exclude government service contractors;since when such employers lose their contracts, their employees ordinarilyare hired by the successor contractor. Similarly, a commenter suggestedthat where work is contracted out and the contractor hires the former employer'sold workers to perform the contracted work, no notice should be requiredunless more than the threshold number of employees are not rehired. Thesedefinitions cannot be squared with the definition of employment loss orwith the statutory structure, which focuses on the effects of employmentlosses on groups of workers. WARN requires notice to workers who lose theirjobs with a particular employer, whether or not other workers have gainedother jobs and whether or not other employers may hire those workers. As noted above, andSection;639.3(f)(4) reiterates the statutory exclusionof certain transfers from the definition of employment loss. Commenterssuggested that further definition of the terms ``relocation'' and ``consolidation''are needed. One commenter suggested that the definition should be consistentwith the definition under the NLRA; which it summarized as stating thatthe terms should be given a broad meaning not dependent on labels, as longas the transfer offer is bona fide and is to a related enterprise. Whilethe Department agrees that a broad definition of the terms is appropriatein light of the intent of WARN to focus on actual losses of employment,the commenter's proposal cannot be accepted since it would give no meaningto the words ``relocation or consolidation''. The final regulations havebeen revised to include a broad definition, suggested by another commenter,under which the transfer of definable business, whether customer orders,product lines or operations, to a different site will be considered a relocationor consolidation. Commenters questioned how to determine whether there has been a more than50% reduction in hours for purposes of the third branch of the definitionof employment loss. They asked whether overtime hours should be counted;whether overtime should be calculated on the basis of an 8-hour day ora 40-hour week; and how to determine the base for employees with fluctuatinghours. The Department thinks that overtime hours or hours in addition tothe normal and customary hours of the worker should not be counted in determiningthe base hours of work. In terms of the other questions, DOL will relyon the definitions found in the FLSA, that overtime is calculated basedon a 40-hour week and that each week is treated separately. For an employeewho works fluctuating hours, the monthly base would be the sum of the non-overtimehours worked in each week of the month. A commenter questioned whether employees laid off for an indefinite period(i.e., where the employer expects to recall them but does not know whethertheir recall will occur before or after 6 months) are automatically tobe considered as experiencing an employment loss at the time of the layoff.In this situation, the layoff is not automatically deemed an employmentloss. If the layoff lasted for more than 6 months, the workers would experiencean employment loss, would be counted toward the trigger level for the plantclosing or mass layoff of which their individual layoffs were a part, andwould have been entitled to notice if the layoff or closing met coveragethresholds. Since an employment loss begins with the layoff and since noticeis due 60 days in advance, a prudent employer wishing to avoid potentialliability would provide notice to the workers at least 60 days prior totheir layoff unless it is certain that the layoff will not exceed 6 months.A commenter asked how to define the date on which to measure the 6-monthperiod to determine whether there has been a more than 50% reduction inhours of work. The commenter suggests using a ``snapshot'' on the datenotice first should be given. While DOL agrees that the determination whethera reduction in hours will take place must be made around the time noticemust be given, the use of the term ``snapshot'' is confusing since it implieslooking at events that have already occurred. Notice that is given basedon what has happened over the past 6 months may be too late. The reduction in hours language of the definition of employment loss isnot explained in the legislative history. This language can be interpretedto require either that notice be given 60 days before the beginning ofthe 6-month period in which hours are to be reduced more than 50% or thatnotice be given 60 days before an employee will suffer 6 consecutive monthsof more than 50% reduction in hours (that is, 60 days before the end ofthe 6-month period.) There are practical reasons for favoring each interpretation.The former interpretation better protects workers against a substantialloss of income. The latter interpretation is more consistent with whatis probably the more common situation, in which substantial reductionsin hours occur, where the reductions are not planned 6 months in advance,but happen incrementally because of changing conditions, for example, areduction in cash flow that extends for many months. Thus, DOL beclievesthat a common sense rule should be followed in determining when to givenotice of a covered reduction in hours: When it becomes evident that thereduction will extend beyond 6 months, WARN notice should be given. Thisrule will, at least, establish the employer's good faith effort to complywith WARN. (Of course, if the employer knows in advance that a reductionin hours of more than 50% will occur for each of 6 months, the rule requiresthat the employer give notice at least 60 days in advance of the beginningof the period or as soon as the duration of the reduction becomes clear.)Another commenter suggested that the regulations should be clarified tostate whether a layoff, recall and layoff of a worker within a 30-day periodconstitutes one or two employment losses. Since WARN defines employmentloss as a layoff exceeding 6 months in duration, a layoff and recall whichoccurred within a 30-day period cannot be an employment loss. Thus, onlythe second layoff may count, if it will be of sufficient duration. <ITAG tagnum="81">(g) Section 639.3(g) Definition of ``Unit of Local Government </ITAG>``Unit of local government'' is defined in the proposed regulations asin the Act. This section also provides a rule, based on total taxes paidto each unit, for determining which unit of local government to notifywhere a plant is located within more than one unit of local government.A commenter pointed out that some taxes are not paid directly to the localgovernment but are paid as a surcharge on a State tax and are collectedby the State. The commenter suggested that the employer may not be ableto easily determine how much tax it paid to a unit of local government.The Department agrees and has revised the definition to include only taxespaid directly to the unit of local government. <ITAG tagnum="81">(h) Section 639.3(h) Definition of ``Part-Time Employee'' </ITAG>The definition of ``part-time employee'' in the proposed regulations followsthe statutory language. Some commenters were unsure whether regular full-timeemployees with employment during less than 6 of the last 12 months wouldbe considered part-time or full-time employees. The statute defines suchemployees as part-time. Other commenters were unsure as to the status of employees who are traditionallyunderstood to be ``seasonal'' and short-term, yet are hired on a recurringbasis. According to the Act, if there employees worked for less than 6of the past 12 months, they are part-time employees. Such employees would,in many cases, also fall under the ``temporary facility/limited employment''exemption in section 4(a). Further, ``seasonal'' employees who work 6 monthsor more may also fall under the ``limited employment'' exemption. In response to commenters' requests for guidelines in determining the periodused in calculating whether a worker has worked ``an average of fewer than20 hours per week,'' DOL has established that the shorter of the time theworker has been employed or the most recent 90 days should be used. <ITAG tagnum="81">(i) Section 639.3(i) Definition of ``Single Site of Employment'' </ITAG>This section provides a definition of ``single site of employment'' whichis drawn from the April 1988 Conference Report on H.R. 3. (H.R. Rep. 100-576,100th Cong., 2nd Sess., 1046 (April 20, 1988)). As a general rule, a geographicconnection or proximity is required to define ``single site of employment.''Even where several distinct operations are performed at a geographicallyconnected site, that building or complex will be counted as a single siteof employment. The regulations also recognize that, in some limited cases,geographically separate sites may still be considered a single site ofemployment because of an inextricable operational connection. DOL intendsthis exception to be a narrow one to cover those cases where separate buildingsare used for the same purpose and share the same staff and equipment. Several commenters expressed concerns that the definition of single siteof employment could be read either too broadly or too narrowly. Two commenterswere concerned that the discussion of geographically separate but operationallyconnected sites in andSection; 639.3(i)(2) could be read broadly to coverseparate sites which occasionally share staff or which are supplied froma common source. As noted above, this exception is intended to be readnarrowly to cover those rare situations in which two separate buildingsshare staff, equipment and functions. DOL believes that the language ofthe exception conveys this narrow reading.A commenter urged that the definition be amended to treat geographicallycontiguous facilities that are functionally separate as distinct sites.The Department agrees that this is an appropriate distinction in thosecases where two plants are clearly separate, that is, where they producedistinct products, have different workforces and have separate managementat the plant level. This reading does not appear to be inconsistent withCongress' concern, reflected in the Conference Report, that geographicallyseparate plants be considered different single sites of employment. Thelanguage of the regulation has been revised to reflect this exception.Again, this is intended to be a narrow exception to the general rule thatgeographically related facilities are single sites of employment and geographicallyseparate facilities are separate sites.The comments just discussed also caused the Department to review the languageof the regulation and to add a new subparagraph to make it clear that inoffice buildings or similar sites, where several different businesses rentor own space, the single site of employment for each employer is the spacewithin the building that it rents or owns.Several commenters focused on the ``catchall clause'' in andSection; 639.3(i)(4).Some commenters suggested that the clause either be clarified or deletedto prevent it becoming an escape clause. Two commenters described theirindividual employment arrangements and suggested that the clause shouldbe interpreted to include them. These employers have cross-plant bumpingand worker transfer among a number of geographically separate facilitiesover a large area, in one case a major metropolitan area, in another aseveral hundred square mile area. Given the concern expressed in the ConferenceReport on H.R. 3 that geographically separate facilities be treated separately,neither of these situations is an appropriate exception to the rule whichCongress intended to apply, that individual plants should be treated individually.(H.R. Rep, 100-576, 100th Cong., 2nd Sess., 1046 (April 20, 1988)). DOLcontinues to believe it prudent, however, to maintain some flexibilityin the definition of ``single site of employment'', to provide for trulyunusual organizational situations which DOL could not anticipate. The clausein andSection; 693.3(i)(4) has been retained in the final regulations, withthe proviso that application of any alternative, situation-specific definitionis allowable only if its use is not intended to evade the purpose of WARNto provide notice. Thus, a firm which has a factory or other site whichwould otherwise qualify as a single site of employment and whose size wouldpermit treatment of some small layoffs as mass layoffs (i.e., a plant thatemploys fewer than 1499 workers) cannot be combined with other sites withinan area for the purpose of eliminating WARN coverage of mass layoffs.A commenter suggested that foreign sites of employment should not be coveredunder WARN. DOL agrees that the general rule is that foreign sites arenot considered covered by a statute unless coverage is specified in thelanguage of the act, and have added an exclusion for foreign sites of employmentto the definition of single site of employment. The exclusion of foreignsites does not exclude the U.S. workers at those foreign sites from beingcounted to determine coverage as an employer, i.e., whether an employerhas 100 employees.<ITAG tagnum="81">(j) Section 639.3(j) Definition of ``Facility or Operating Unit''</ITAG>The regulations adopt common sense definitions of the terms ``facility''and ``operating unit'' within a single site of employment. These termsare important for determining whether a plant closing has occurred. DOLhas defined these terms in a manner which attempts to define physicallyand operationally distinct entities for purposes of determining whethera plant closing, the shutdown of a distinct entity, has occurred.Several commenters were concerned that the definition of ``operating unit''was overly broad and suggested that it be made clear that the term refersto only a ``fundamental, distinct or structural organizational segmentof the enterprise''. These commenters were critically of the use of theword ``task'' within the definition, arguing that the term is capable ofapplication to activities that are neither fundamental nor distinct. Anothercommenter thought the definition was too narrow and should be revised toinclude any distinct operation, department or division of work at a worksite,defined in terms of function or organization. While these two commentersare apparently seeking different results in terms of how operating unitswould be defined in practice, there appears to be little difference inthe definitions they present and DOL agrees with both commenters that onlydistinct structural or operational entities within a single site of employmentare intended to be included as operating units. DOL agrees that the useof the word ``task'' might be construed to include specific work assignmentswithin a distinct unit that would not be appropriately included as an operatingunit. The final regulations do not use the term ``fundamental'' in thedefinition simply because it might create more ambiguities in applyingthe definition that it would avoid. The definition of operating unit has,therefore, been revised to include these concepts. The revised definitionreads: ``an organizationally or operationally distinct product, operationor specific work function''.Two examples may help to clarify our view of the appropriate limits ofthe definition. If an automobile manufacturing plant has an assembly linewhich assembles cars, there may be groups of workers whose job is to puton the doors or the bumpers. The operating unit should be the assemblyline, not the groups of workers who perform the task of door or bumperassembly. Similarly, a data processing department may have within it dataentry workers, computer programmers, computer maintenance workers and clericalworkers. If the department is clearly a distinct entity in terms of theemployer's organizational structure, the data processing department isthe appropriate operating unit and the separate task groups are simplya part of that operating unit. (These examples are merely illustrativeand are not intended to create rules applicable to all assembly lines ordata processing departments. There may well be cases in which workers performingdifferent jobs as a part of a larger operation may be sufficiently organizationallyor operationally distinct to be defined as a separate operating unit.)The critical factor in determining what constitutes an operating unit willbe the organizational or operational structure of the single site of employment.Sources of evidence which will assist in defining separate and distinctunits will be applicable collective bargaining agreements, the employer'sorganizational structure and industry understandings of what constitutedistinct work functions. One commenter suggested that in the trucking industry,lines of progression would constitute operating units, i.e., over-the-roaddrivers, mechanics and clericals would each be in separate operating units.As the Department understands the comment, the use of lines of progressionmay well be an appropriate basis for defining operating units in the truckingindustry. In other industries, however, seniority lines or lines of progressionmay not be a useful basis for defining an operating unit. Several differentgroups of workers in different lines of progression may be organized intoa recognized department, like the data processing department discussedabove, which would be an operating unit.In the preamble to the proposed regulations the following example was usedto illustrate the operating unit definition: ``a 24-hour store eliminatingits night shift would not carry out a closing of an operating unit, butthe elimination of all warehouse and stock workers on all three shiftswould constitute the closing of an operating unit if 50 or more workerswere affected''. Several commenters disagreed with the example. Some suggestedthat shifts could constitute operating units depending on the employer'sorganizational structure and whether the elimination of the shift ``resultsin the closing of the facility during the time the workforce was previouslyemployed''. It is possible that there may be situations in which shiftscan be operating units if the workers on the shift perform some separateand distinct function from the workers on other shifts. If, for example,a shift performed only maintenance functions which were not performed onother shifts, if the workers on that shift were in a separate job classificationand, possibly, if the workers were recognized in the employer's organizationalstructure or in applicable collective bargaining agreements as a separatedepartment, the shift could be an operating unit. The Department disagrees,however, that the mere closing of a plant for hours when it was previouslyopen constitutes the closing of an operating unit. As long as the plantcontinues to operate and no recognized department, operation or major workfunction has been terminated, the fact of a reduction in hours of plantoperation is not the closing of an operating unit.Other commenters disagreed that all warehouse and stock workers would necessarilyconstitute an operating unit. They suggested that whether such workerswould be defined as an operating unit would depend on the employer's organization.If the store were organized by product departments, the departments wouldbe the operating units and the stock workers would be assigned to thoseunits. DOL agrees that, in the situation posited, the product departmentsare the operating units.Another commenter suggested that the definition of operating unit shouldexclude ``common tasks'' such as maintenance, secretarial or housekeeping.Whether maintenance, clerical or housekeeping workers will be consideredas an operating unit will depend on how they are organized and how theyoperate. If there is a separate maintenance or housekeeping departmentor a central clerical pool, the workers in those units will be in separateoperating units. If the workers are assigned to other distinct departments,for example, if different clerical workers work exclusively in severaldistinct departments, the workers will be considered assigned to thosedepartments.Another commenter suggested that the definition of operating unit is toobroad and proposed that operating units should be defined only as includingproduction processes and should not include support staff. The Departmentdisagrees. The reason for the use of the term ``operating unit'' in WARNis to apply the protections of the law to small units of workers in a largerplant when their units are closed. It is not relevant to this purpose whetherthe workers are production workers or support workers; their job loss andtheir need for protection is as real in either case.A commenter suggested that the definition of operating unit be clarifiedto reflect that, in the construction industry, employees of a subcontractoron the construction site where several different activities are takingplace are an operating unit. DOL agrees that this will often be the caseif the workers are performing a separate part of the work. However, thiswould not necessarily always be the case. Consistent with the decisionnot to attempt to cover industry-specific cases in the regulations, thesefinal regulations have not been revised to provide for this particularcase.Another commenter suggested that in the railroad industry certain maintenancecrews have no home base and should be treated as separate operating units.While such workers may well be considered as a separate operating unit,their status must be determined in terms of the single site of employmentto which they are assigned. These workers may not have an assigned homebase, but they must get their orders or assignments from somewhere, evenif that place changes from time to time. In order to cover this situationand the situation of outstationed workers and traveling workers who reportto but do not work out of a particular office, that part of the regulationrelating to mobile workers has been revised to clarify that such workersshould be treated as assigned to their home base or to the single sitefrom which their work is assigned or to which they report. This part ofthe definition has been moved, for reasons of organizational clarity, tobe a part of the definition of ``single site of employment'' in andSection;639.3(i).<ITAG tagnum="81">(k) Section 639.3(k) Definition of ``State Dislocated Worker Unit''</ITAG>The definition of the term ``State dislocated worker unit'' refers to thestatutory provisions under which such units are created. None of the commentsdiscussed this definition and it remains unchanged.<ITAG tagnum="81">(l) Section 639.3(l) Definition of ``State''</ITAG>The definition of State refers to the 50 States, the District of Columbia,the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. None of thecomments discussed this definition and it remains unchanged.(5) Section 639.4 Who Must Give NoticeThe prefatory language in andSection; 639.4 states the basic rule of WARNabout giving notice to the appropriate parties. None of the comments discussedthis definition and it remains unchanged.<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.4(a) Who Should Give Notice</ITAG>This section discusses who, within the employer's organization, shouldgive notice. None of the comments discussed this definition and it remainsunchanged.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.4(b) Layoffs That Extend Beyond 6 Months</ITAG>This section discusses an employer's responsibility in situations in whicha covered layoff, which originally was announced as being for 6 monthsor less in duration, is extended beyond 6 months and, therefore, fallswithin the definition of ``employment loss'' in section 2(a)(6) of WARNand triggers the requirement of notice. One commenter proposed that anysuggestion in the regulations that employers indicate the length of layoffsbe deleted since some courts might interpret it as a requirement. Anothercommenter suggested that there should be no requirement of written noticefor layoffs of 6 months or less. Another commenter objected to the inclusionof the phrase ``consistent with section 3(c) of WARN'' and suggested thatthe requirements of that section be spelled out.In response to these comments and the Department's own review of the statuteand the regulations, language has been added to the final regulations inan effort to provide better guidance to employers. The Department's viewis that an employer who announced at the outset that a layoff would befor 6 months or less, who did not provide advance notice under WARN andwho plans to extend the layoff beyond 6 months may violate the Act unless:(i) The extension is due to business circumstances (including unforeseeablechanges in price or cost) not reasonably foreseeable at the time of theinitial layoff; and (ii) notice is given when it becomes reasonably foreseeablethat the extension is required. A layoff extending beyond 6 months forany other reason is treated as an employment loss from the date of itscommencement. Although the standard for foreseeability under this provisionmay be seen as less exacting than it is under the ``unforeseeable businesscircumstances'' exception of section 3(b)(2)(A) of WARN, due to the additionof the parenthetical phrase in section 3(c), there still may be situationsin which an employer may be found in violation of WARN when it gives noticethat a layoff will extend beyond 6 months. For example, if an employershuts down for 5 months to retool his plant for a new product line andthe retooling process takes longer than originally anticipated, <T3>and the employer has experienced similar delays in previous retoolings</T3>,the employer may be liable under WARN for having failed to give notice60 days before the shutdown was begun since the cause of the extensionarguably was foreseeable. An employer may, therefore, want to considergiving notice at least 60 days prior to the layoff unless it is certainthat the layoff will not exceed six months.The Department does not view the regulations as requiring any form of noticeof a layoff that will not extend for more than 6 months. The statutoryuse of the term ``announced'' merely recognizes the reality that if anemployer closes down or lays off some workers for a short period of timeand expects to reopen or recall the workers, it will somehow communicateto the workers the fact that the closing or layoff is temporary.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) Section 693.3(c) Sales of Businesses</ITAG>WARN creates an absolute division of responsibility for giving notice betweena buyer and a seller of a business; the seller is liable to give noticeof covered actions which occur up to and including the date (time) of saleand the buyer is responsible thereafter. Thus, at all times one of theparties to the transaction is responsible for giving notice. The proposedregulations offered guidance to employers anticipating a sale or purchasetransaction to avoid confusion regarding service of notice and liabilityunder WARN, by suggesting that each party's responsibility with respectto these items be covered in the contract of sale.There were a wide variety of comments on this provision. One commentersuggested that the regulations make it clear that if the employees of abusiness that has been sold are not rehired by the buyer, the responsibilityfor giving notice is on the seller. The Department believes that such anallocation of responsibility is precisely contrary to the statutory languageand intent. If a plant closing occurred as a result of the buyer's decisionnot to rehire the seller's workers, and the closing occurred after theeffective time of the sale, the buyer is responsible for giving notice.This view is consistent with the statutory provision that the employeesof the seller become the employees of the buyer immediately after the sale,with the intent of WARN that notice be given to workers who will sufferdislocations and with the reality of allocating responsibility for noticeto the party to the transaction that actually makes the decision to orderthe plant closing or mass layoff. Other commenters agreed with the allocationof notice responsibility just discussed; one suggested that the apportionmentof liability turn solely on when the plant closing or mass layoff occursrelative to the effective date of the sale.Some commenters suggested that the regulations be clarified to assign responsibilityto the seller through the date of sale and to the buyer on the next day.Such an interpretation is a possible reading of the statutory language;but DOL has rejected that reading because it would either make the sellerresponsible for the acts of the buyer or it would create a period in whichno one is responsible for giving notice. The former alternative is inconsistentwith the legal position of the parties after the sale has become effective.The latter alternative is inconsistent with the intent of the statute.A commenter suggested that the regulations make it clear that the selleris not responsible for a layoff ordered by the buyer within 60 days ofthe sale. For the reasons already discussed, DOL agrees that no such responsibilityattaches.Several commenters suggested that no employment loss is experienced ina sale situation if the seller's employees are hired by the buyer within6 months of the sale. Assuming there has been an announcement that a layoffof 6 months or less has been ordered, this is a correct statement sincethe definition of employment loss excludes layoffs of 6 months or less.Several commenters discussed the provision of WARN that assigns the seller'semployees to the buyer after the sale. These commenters agreed that thisprovision does not create any additional employment rights, other thanWARN notice rights and that, although a technical termination (i.e., thetermination of employment with the seller) may be deemed to have occurredin a sale, that termination, by itself, is not a basis for WARN notice.One commenter suggested that nothing in the WARN provision on sales requiresthat a buyer actually hire the seller's employees. Another commenter suggestedthat it should be made clear that employees in a sale situation have thesame WARN rights as do any other workers. The Department generally agreeswith all these statements and believes the final regulations reflect them;but notes that the buyer is responsible for giving notice to workers ifit does not hire them.One commenter suggested that the regulation should focus on the closingdate and time of the sale, not on the effective date and time. The Departmentdoes not view these terms as different and the final regulations continueto use the term ``effective date'' because it is used in the Act.One commenter suggested that the phrase ``at all times, one of the partiesto the transaction is responsible for giving notice'' be added to the regulations.DOL agrees and has added the phrase in the final regulations.The variety of comments suggests that the regulations needed to be clarified,along the lines suggested in this discussion. This section has been revisedextensively. The examples in andSection; 639.4(c)(1)-(3) have been revisedto make it clear that these are merely suggestions about how the buyerand seller may wish to handle notice responsibilities between themselvesand do not change the basic allocation of responsibility for notice. Whilespecific mention of the contract of sale has been deleted in the finalregulations, since the parties to a transaction may utilize other methodsto allocate WARN responsibility, DOL continues to suggest that prudentemployers make provisions for WARN notice, if applicable, in the contractof sale or elsewhere. The federal regulations also make it clear that ifthe seller gives notice as the buyer's agent, the responsibility for givingnotice still remains with the buyer.The FHLBB also described the situation in which it takes over an institutionand keeps it operating while seeking to merge it with another bank or tofind new owners. In that case, the new owner stands in the position ofa buyer under WARN and is responsible for notice from the time the mergeror acquisition becomes effective.One commenter suggested that DOL not promulgate regulations on sales. DOLbelieves that such a course of action would be inconsistent with its statutoryrole and with its efforts to assist employers and workers in fully understandingtheir rights and obligations under a complex statute.(6) Section 639.5 When Must Notice Be Given<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.5(a) General Rule</ITAG>This section discusses the basic WARN rule that notice must be given 60days in advance of a planned plant closing or mass layoff. It also discussesthe 30- and 90-day aggregation periods found in sections 2(a) and 3(d)of WARN and suggests alternative rules for measuring the size of an employer'sworkforce for determining whether coverage thresholds are met.Notice with respect to an individual worker's employment loss must be given60 days in advance of that worker's separation from employment. In responseto requests for clarification as to what date is the separation date, theDepartment has specified in andSection; 639.5(a)(1) of the regulations thata worker's last day of employment is considered the date of that worker'slayoff. The word ``calendar'' also has been added in this section to clarifythat 60-day notice is not based on working days.To aid employers in complying with the Act and issuing notice when it isdue, DOL suggests that the employers look ahead and behind, not only 30days, but 90 days (to determine whether coverage is triggered under section3(d) of the Act) in determining whether planned employment actions willtrigger notice requirements. By doing this, an employer can look at itsplanned employment actions in the broader framework of the Act, and reducepotential liability for failure to give notice when thresholds have beenmet. For example, if an employer has 300 employees, 60 of whom experiencean employment loss on March 5 and an additional 40 of whom suffer an employmentloss on March 30, sixty days' notice is required for both the March 5 andthe March 30 employment losses, since they occurred within a 30-day periodand constitute a mass layoff. If a third layoff affecting 60 employeesoccurs on April 20, these employees also are entitled to notice since theiremployment losses fall within a second 30-day period which includes theMarch 30 layoffs.Section 3(d) of WARN provides that if, within a 90-day period, separateemployment losses occur, each of which involves fewer than the number ofworkers necessary to trigger coverage but which together add up to theminimum numbers necessary to trigger coverage, WARN notice must be givenunless the employer can demonstrate that the individual actions arose fromseparate and distinct causes. The Department recognizes that this provisionmay place employers in jeopardy for failing to accurately predict theiremployment actions. DOL is, however, constrained to interpret the provisionaccording to its terms. It is important to note that the 90-day aggregationprovision applies only to separate actions each of which is under the coveragethreshold. Thus, small plant closings or layoffs are not aggregated withcovered plant closings or mass layoffs. Also, as some commenters pointedout, it does appear that, in some cases where an employer underestimatesthe size of a layoff, the unforeseeable business circumstances exceptionfor reduced notice may be applicable. Use of this exception may reduceliability for the second group of workers who are laid off, but it doesnot appear to provide much assistance as to the failure to give noticeto the first group.A number of commenters asked for additional definition of the term ``separateand distinct actions and causes''. One suggested that the definition bethat the layoffs arise from different events. Another commenter suggestedthat, in the construction industry, the completion of one phase of a projectand the layoff of the crafts workers on that phase should be consideredas separate and distinct causes. The Department does not find either ofthese suggestions helpful; the first is too ambiguous to be useful; thesecond, while probably correct in the context of the construction and similarindustries, does not provide a general definition. (In any event, sincemost construction workers will be engaged in work on temporary projects,the definition will be irrelevant to most layoffs in that industry.) DOLhas considered these comments, but believes that the words of the statuteare clear.One commenter suggested that the regulations not include language thatan employer should look ahead 90 days to determine whether separate butrelated events will trigger coverage. The commenter argues that this languageis gratuitous and might undermine an employer's defense that the layoffsarose from separate and distinct causes. The Department believes that thislanguage is an appropriate caution to employers about the obligations whichWARN places upon them.One commenter gave a specific example of a situation in which 90-day aggregationmight apply and asked questions about the application of that provision.The commenter offered the following example:Day 1_Company has 180 employees;Day 2_Company terminates 30 employees (now 150 employees);Day 31_Company terminates 29 employees (now 121 employees);Day 60_Company terminates 6 employees (now 115 employees);Day 90_Company terminates 5 employees (now 110 employees).The commenter asked, to whom is the company liable? The commenter arguedthat there is liability only to the first 30 workers because the otherthree groups when aggregated do not constitute \1/3\ of the number of employeeson Day 31 and, therefore, the mass layoff threshold has not been met asto those workers. The commenter also asked what if the first group were``fired'' for cause, poor productivity; is there a violation if there areno further layoffs?In answer to these questions: Assuming that no notice was given, the companyis liable to all 70 employees because the mass layoff threshold has beenreached through separate actions which did not occur for separate and distinctcauses within a 90-day period. All employees terminated within the 90-dayperiod have suffered a mass layoff and all are entitled to 60 days' noticebefore the date of their termination. For this purpose, the date on whichthe company size is measured is Day 1. (Note that the aggregation periodsare rolling and the second layoff starts a second 90-day period where theapplicable workforce is 121 workers.) On the second question, if the workerswere fired for cause they have not suffered an employment loss as definedin WARN section 2(a)(6)(A), which excludes discharges for cause. (The remaining40 workers who suffered an employment loss are not numerous enough to triggermass layoff coverage.) It is, however, likely that a mass firing will bechallenged and if it is determined that the firing was not for cause, thenotice obligation will revive. The courts may well look at the questionof whether the mass firing was intended to evade the Act.The regulation also provides for a ``snapshot'' test for determining thenumber of employees in an employer's workforce or at a single site of employmentfor purposes of determining coverage. The ``snapshot'' test is simply tolook at the employer's employment levels on the date notice is due to begiven. An alternative test also is suggested for those unusual situationsin which the results of the snapshot test are not representative. Underthe alternative test, an employer or employees may look to a date or toa time period in which employment levels were more representative. A number of commenters suggested that the alternative test be abandonedbecause it might create too many ambiguities and because it might leadto second guessing in many situations. DOL believes that there are situationsin which the workforce at a single point in time may be genuinely unrepresentativeand may lead to inappropriate coverage or lack of coverage, such as situationswhere workers are temporarily transferred among plants. Because there isa need to provide protection to both employers and workers in these cases,the final regulations retain the alternative test. In so doing, the finalregulations have been revised to stress that the alternative test is intendedto be used only in unusual situations. It is not to be applied in caseswhere a workforce has shrunk through ordinary attrition. Language has beenadded to the final regulations to make it clear that the alternative testis only to be used in unusual situations and is not to be invoked for thepurpose of evading WARN. Another commenter disagreed with both the snapshot and the alternativetests. The commenter argued that the employer's workforce should be determinedbefore notice is due to be given. The commenter suggested a bright linetest for determining coverage: an employer should be covered if, at anytime before an employment loss, it had 100 or more workers. While, froma practical point of view the employer probably must look at its workforceon the date on which it must decide to give notice, the Department concludesthat the use of the date on which notice is to be given is a reasonabledate to use and is more easily applied than any alternative date. The commenter'ssuggested test poses serious problems because it does not permit legitimateshrinkage of the workforce due to attrition to be taken into account andsince it does not apply to measuring the workforce at a single site ofemployment for purposes of determining whether mass layoff thresholds havebeen met. Questions were raised with regard to whether temporary employees are tobe counted when determining whether the closing/layoff threshold is reached.As stated earlier, there is no exception for counting temporary employeesin the law or the regulations. Part-time employees, as defined in WARN,are the only workers that are not counted when making this threshold determination.Temporary employees, unless they are part-time, should, therefore, be includedin the calculation. Several commenters raised a related issue not covered in the regulations.They suggested that an exception for government ordered closings be includedin the regulations. No language recognizing such an exception appears inWARN and the Department is reluctant to create such an exception. However,some government-ordered closings may constitute unforeseeable businesscircumstances to which reduced notice applies. This approach is supportedin the legislative history. (133 CONG REC S9435 (daily ed. July 8, 1987)(remarks of Sen. Kennedy)). Although this treatment will lead to afterthe fact notice in some cases, it also will lead to the provision of somenotice to workers affected by the closing. These workers have a legitimateneed for notice, particularly for notice of whether the closing will bea permanent or temporary closing. Some commenters discussed several types of governmental actions which theyargued should be treated as government ordered closings. DOL agrees thatthose closings which are the direct result of governmental action and whichoccur without notice should be counted as government ordered closings towhich after the fact notice is applicable. Examples of such closings wouldbe the closing of a restaurant by a local health department or the closingof nuclear power plant by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. Other agenciesdo not take such direct action. For example, the Occupational Safety andHealth Administration and the Environmental Protection Agency take enforcementactions which might result in the closing of a plant by the employer eitherto remedy the violation or because it cannot continue to operate. Theseagencies do not, however, directly order the closing of the plant and theyusually give some notice of the violation and an opportunity to contestthe findings. Such closings, although they may result from a governmentaction, are not government ordered and are not subject to the same treatment.(Depending on the length of the notice given, a claim that the closingsqualify for reduced notice under the unforeseeable business circumstancesexception may be available.) A commenter also suggested that terminationsof government contracts should qualify as government ordered closings.In most cases, there is some notice of the government's intent to terminatea contract, even if the termination is for cause and, for the reasons statedabove, these contract terminations should not be treated as governmentordered closings. The Department notes an important difference between the closings discussedabove and the absolute closing of a savings and loan institution by theFHLBB. In the case discussed above, the employer remains in control ofits business. The employer can remedy the conditions that caused the closingand reopen the business. In the cause of an absolute closing or shut-downof a S andamp; L, in contrast, the previous ownership is ousted from controlof the institution and the FSLIC assumes control of the enterprise. Inthis case, there is no employer to give notice and the after the fact noticerequirement cannot be imposed, since the S andamp; L employer has been removed.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.5(b) Transfers</ITAG>This section discusses the application of section 2(b)(2) of WARN whichexcludes certain transfers from the definition of employment loss. It discusseswhat kind of transfer offer meets the statutory requirement, the definitionof ``reasonable commuting distance'' and discusses the operation of theprovision relating to transfers beyond a reasonable commuting distance.A number of commenters criticized the inclusion in the regulations of therequirement that, in order to qualify as a transfer to which the exclusionapplies, a transfer must be to a job that is ``substantially equivalentin terms of pay and working conditions.'' That language was adopted becauseof the use of the term ``equivalent position'' in the Senate Report onS. 538. (S. Rep. 100-62, 100th Cong., 1st Sess., 23, 69-70 (June 2, 1987).)The transfer provision in the Senate Bill differed substantially from thepresent transfer provision in WARN. The Provision in the Senate Bill wasan exemption to coverage involving the transfer of ``substantially all''of the affected workers with no more than a two-week break in employment.The WARN transfer provision focuses on the individual worker and permitsa break in employment of no more than 6 months. The Department has foundnothing in the legislative history to explain these changes. The Departmentagrees that the language of the transfer provision is not consistent withthe definition of employment loss, to which the break in employment provisionappears related. The Department concludes that its earlier reliance onthe legislative history is not supported by the later changes in the languageof the transfer provision. The ``substantial equivalence'' requirementhas, therefore, been deleted from the final regulations. Consistent withthe earlier discussion of the law of constructive discharge, language hasbeen added to the final regulation to state that a job offer which constitutesa constructive discharge constitutes an employment loss for purposes ofWARN.Several commenters criticized the adoption of the Internal Revenue Service(IRS) definition of ``reasonable commuting distance'' as the definitionof the same term for WARN purposes. Some commenters suggested other factorsthat should be added to the definition. These included industry practice,a comparison of the employee's pre- and post-commuting times, transportationcosts in the area and the availability of alternate forms of transportation,public transportation and car and vanpools. One commenter suggested thatthe regulations should state that transfers within a metro-wide area arealways within a reasonable commuting distance. Other commenters suggestedthe adoption of a standard, such as the 30 miles/45 minutes ``rule of thumb''contained in the Senate Committee Report on S. 538. (S. Rep. 100-62, 100thCong., 1st Sess., 23 (June 2, 1987).) One commenter suggested that theregulation should permit the employer to rely on a written acknowledgmentfrom the worker that the commuting distance is reasonable.The Department borrowed the IRS definition because it appears to be appropriatelygeneral to permit considerable flexibility in arriving at a determinationof what constitutes a reasonable commuting distance. In doing so, the Departmentdid not intend to adopt all the IRS interpretations that apply to situationsnot directly relevant to WARN. The language of the final regulation has,therefore, been revised to eliminate specific reference to the IRS regulation.DOL believes that the IRS definition encompasses all of the factors discussedby the commenters. The Department notes that the determination of whatis a reasonable commuting distance may be strongly influenced by industrypractice or the provisions of collective bargaining agreements. While settinga ``rule of thumb'' has some appeal, DOL has decided not to do so becauseany such role could be inappropriate in a large number of situations andmay cause more confusion than it eliminates. Similarly, establishing arule of thumb that transfers within a metropolitan area are always withina reasonable commuting distance is inappropriate, although such transferswill usually meet the definition. In the case of the specific commenter,it appears that the company's collective bargaining agreements recognizethe metropolitan area as an area within which transfers are permissible.In that case, any transfer within the metropolitan area would be deemedto be within a reasonable commuting distance. While an employer may seekto obtain written acknowledgments that a transfer is within a reasonablecommuting distance, adopting that practice as a rule poses three problems:First, it may be seen to require employers to adopt certain employmentpractices; second, it will not provide an employer any protection if workersrefuse to sign the acknowledgment; and third, the employer might not findout that not enough workers will sign the acknowledgment until after thetime to give notice has passed, thus possibly becoming liable for failingto give notice.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) </ITAG>Section 639.5(c) Temporary Projects or FacilitiesThis section discusses the exemption from notice in section 4(a)(1) ofWARN. Under that exemption, no notice is required to be given when a plantclosing or mass layoff occurs because of the closing of a temporary facilityor the completion of a temporary project or undertaking, and the affectedworkers were hired with the understanding that their employment was limitedto the duration of the facility or project. Since such an understandingcould arise in a variety of ways, the proposed regulation specifies referenceto employment contracts or local or industry employment practices, butleaves the burden of proof to employers. The regulation also discussessome examples of what do and do not constitute temporary projects.Some commenters, representing the construction industry, requested an exemptionfor their industry. DOL does not believe that industry-specific exemptionsfrom WARN notice requirements are appropriate or justified. The constructionindustry and similar industries, including the shipbuilding industry andthe roadbuilding industry, will receive appropriate treatment under thetemporary projects exemption. To the extent that their workforces onlywork on a project-specific basis, the employers are exempted from havingto give notice under the Act and the regulations. To the extent that theyemploy workers on a more permanent basis, an exemption would defeat thepurpose of WARN.Several commenters opposed the imposition of a temporal limitation in thedefinition of ``project''. They pointed out that certain projects, likedams, take years to complete. The discussion of the duration of a job inandSection; 639.5(c)(4) was not intended to suggest a time limitation ontemporary projects. It was intended to respond to comments that suggestedthat certain long-term contractual arrangements also should be consideredtemporary projects. Nonetheless, that point can be made without referenceto the duration of the contract and the final regulation has been revisedto eliminate the reference.A commenter criticized the same provision, arguing that long-term governmentcontracts can be cancelled with less than 60 days' notice and that employersshould be absolved from giving notice in that situation. DOL disagreeswith this analysis. The temporary projects exemption applies to the natureof the project, not to the length of the notice given when it is terminated.If an employer receives less than 60 days' notice of cancellation, it maybe able to give less than 60 days' notice under the unforeseeable businesscircumstances exception.Another commenter pointed out that to qualify as a temporary project, aproject must be for a ``defined and limited'' period and must have beenbegun with ``an announced and ascertainable duration and a terminal point''.DOL generally agrees with this characterization of the statutory requirement.It must be recognized, however, that the duration and terminal point ofmany temporary projects may not be capable of being precisely defined atthe beginning of the project due to the vargaries of other conditions andother factors. What is important is that it be clear at the outset thatupon the completion of some defined undertaking, the project will be complete.Several commenters opposed the use of the word ``clearly'' when describingthe workers' understanding that a project is temporary. Another commenteropposed the assignment to employers of the burden of proof of the existenceof the understanding that the project is temporary. The word ``clearly''comes from the description of the Congressional understanding of the waythe exemption would work in the Conference Report on H.R. 3. (H.R. Rep.No. 100-576, 100th Cong., 2d Sess., 1051 (April 20, 1988)). Although itis true that the statute does not mention the burden of proof as it doesin other instances, it is reasonable to assign the burden to the employerin this case because the employer is seeking an exemption from the generalrule of 60-day notice (or, legally speaking, is asserting an affirmativedefense) and because, in the nature of the language of the exemption, itis the employer that must prove that it communicated the nature of theproject. The final regulation has been revised to make it clear that theemployer must show that it communicated to its employees the temporarynature of the project or facility. The final regulation also has been revisedto make it clear that the test of clear communication focuses on the understandingsof the affected employees in general, not on whether each individual employeeunderstood the temporary nature of the project or facility. Another commenter supported the approach taken in the regulation, arguingthat if the worker understood that he/she would be transferred to anotherproject at the completion of the work, the exemption does not apply. DOLagrees with this formulation. The last point is particularly important.Commenters in the shipbuilding industry referred to their ``core staff''when describing their operations which the commenters claimed were temporaryprojects. While the Department agrees that the projects described in thecomments qualify as temporary projects, if the term ``core staff'' refersto workers who remain on the payroll and move from project to project,the temporary project exemption would not apply to those workers becausethey would not understand that they had been hired to work on a particularproject. Some of the comments suggested that the commenters interpreted the regulationto require written notice that the job is a temporary project and insistedthat the regulations should recognize industry practice. DOL believes thatthese commenters have misread the regulation, which specifically refersto ``the employment practices of an industry or a locality''. Referenceto collective bargaining agreements as a source of evidence of the understandingthat the project or facility is temporary also has been added in the finalregulations. One commenter suggested a form of written notice to workers which employersmight use to reflect the understanding that the work is on a temporaryproject.<ITAG tagnum="21">Workers on this project are being hired on a project-only basis. Whenthis contract is completed, your job will be terminated. At that time,you may or may not be offered another job on a different project as needsdictate.</ITAG>Such written notice is not always required by WARN since industry practicemay be sufficient to demonstrate that workers understand that their jobsare on temporary projects. It may, however, be useful to some employersto give written notice. To provide assistance to those employers who maywish to give written notice that a job is on a temporary project, DOL hasreviewed the commenter's proposed language. While the last sentence mightbe considered confusing, DOL understands that in the construction and similarindustries workers often work for the same employer on different projects.In light of that fact, the notice as a whole appears to adequately conveythe temporary nature of the job. Another commenter suggested that the words ``or project'' be added to clarifythe example in andSection; 639.5(c)(3). The Department agrees and has sorevised the final regulation. A commenter suggested that the temporary projects exemption should applyto depletable resources. This does not appear to be an appropriate extensionof the exemption since depletable resources may last for so long a timethat they cannot be said to have a termination date, even though eventuallythe resource may run out. A commenter asked that the regulations include transportation projectsin the regulation. Another commenter asked that it be made clear that theexamples in the regulation are not inclusive. DOL agrees with the secondcommenter; the purpose of the example in the regulation (as with exemplesin other parts of these rules) is to be illustrative, not to include everyindustry that might work on temporary projects. The Department also agreesthat roadbuilding projects may qualify as temporary. A commenter asked that the regulation be clarified as to the constructionindustry to acknowledge that the completion of a project may result ina layoff from a job but not a separation from the industry. DOL assumesthat this is true for most industries that work on temporary projects,but has decided not to revise the regulations to reflect this fact. The FHLBB stated that when it closes down a savings and loan institution,it sometimes rehires the employees of the closed institution to work onclosing down the bank. The FSLIC rehires the workers with the understandingthat their work will only last until the affairs of the S andamp; L are woundup, although the time that this task will take is not certain at the timethe workers are rehired. The FHLBB suggested that these employees shouldbe covered under the temporary projects exemption. DOL agrees, under thecircumstances stated, that these workers are covered under the temporaryprojects exemption. A commenter from the trucking industry suggested that the temporary projectsexemption should cover ``casual'' workers in that industry, that is, workerswho are hired on an ``as needed'' basis when freight volumes increase andare laid off indefinitely subject to recall. The Department does not agreethat these workers, while their work may be temporary, are working on atemporary project, which is a distinct undertaking not simply an increasein already existing and continuing work. It appears from the descriptionof these workers that most of them will be part-time workers for WARN purposes(i.e., they will work less than 6 months in any 12-month period) and thusare not counted in determining whether a plant closing or mass layoff hasoccurred. Another commenter suggested that the definition of temporary project includeproject-specific fabrication or component manufacturing. To the extentthat workers are hired specifically and only to work on fabrication orcomponent manufacturing that relates to a specific project, they will beworking on a temporary project. To the extent that workers manufactureor fabricate components for more than one project, they will not qualify.DOL believes that the regulation adequately covers those workers in anyindustries to which it is applicable. <ITAG tagnum="81">(d) Section 639.5(d) Strikes and Lockouts Exemption </ITAG>This section discusses the strikes and lockouts exemption of section 4(d)of WARN. That exemption provides that notice is not required to be givenwhere a plant closing or mass layoff ``constitutes'' a strike or lockoutnot intended to evade the requirements of the Act. Notice is also not requiredwhen an employer permanently replaces ``a person who is deemed to be aneconomic striker'' under the NLRA. The exemption provision in the Act alsoindicates that nothing in WARN affects judicial or administrative rulingsrelating to the hiring of permanent replacements for economic strikersunder the NLRA. Because this language is so closely tied to another law,administered by another agency having expertise in this area, DOL has chosennot to attempt any extensive regulatory explanation of this provision.The Department solicited comments on issues related to strikes and lockouts.One commenter recommended that the regulations should include the definitionof lockout which appears in the Conference Report on H.R. 3, i.e., a lockoutoccurs when, for tactical reasons relating to collective bargaining, anemployer refuses to utilize some or all of its employees for the performanceof available work. (H.R. Rep. 100-576, 100th Cong., 2d Sess., 1051 (April20, 1988).) The Department agrees, and has included this definition inandSection; 639.5(d). Consequently, a layoff that occurs in response to adecrease in orders, and thus a lack of work, in anticipation of a possiblelabor dispute cannot be characterized as a lockout. The Department also is aware that lockouts may occur for defensive reasonsin the course of a labor dispute. The Conference Report definition doesnot appear to take account of that possibility. In the final regulations,the definition of lockout has been modified to cover defensive lockoutsthat occur during labor disputes. Several commenters objected to the inclusion of the phrase ``in the normalcourse of collective bargaining'' in the regulation, arguing that it couldbe construed to exclude sympathy or wildcat strikes from the coverage ofthe exemption. The Department agrees that this construction is possiblebut was not intended and has deleted the phrase. Whether a strike or otherform of concerted activity will fall under this exemption is ultimatelya question which will have to be decided under the NLRA or other applicablelaws. A commenter suggested that the regulations should make it clear that workslowdowns also are included under the strikes/lockouts exemption. Thisis a complex area of law under the NLRA and other federal statutes. Becauseother agencies with responsibility to administer these statutes regularlyare involved in these areas, the regulations will not address the issue.A commenter questioned whether notice is required when an employer permanentlyshuts down or relocates an operation after the commencement of a lockout.The exemption for a lockout is applicable only if the closing or layoffconstitutes a lockout. If, after the commencement of a lockout, anotherdecision is made which results in employment loss for a sufficient numberof workers (including locked-out workers), as might occur if an employerdecided to relocate, notice would be due based on the new circumstances.A commenter suggested that the regulation should be revised to providethat an employer need not give notice when replacing an unfair labor practicestriker since it will be required to rehire that worker at the end of thestrike. WARN specifically mentions the permanent replacement of economicstrikers but provides no other exceptions for notice of replacement forother kinds of strikers. Also, as discussed above, the Department doesnot view the strikes/lockouts exemption as applying to situations in whichplant closings or mass layoffs are ordered because of other conditionsthan the particular strike or lockout. For these reasons, and because thestatus of strikers raises many complex questions under the NLRA and otherfederal laws, the Department has not revised the regulations in the mannersuggested. A commenter suggested that the regulations provide for some method to determinewhether a lockout is intended to evade the purposes of the Act. The commentersuggested that if an employer remains closed for 4 months, it should berequired to demonstrate an intent to reopen. The Department does not viewthis as a practical suggestion, since WARN provides no administrative mechanismfor monitoring compliance. Also, given the complexities of the collectivebargaining process, DOL can see no basis for imposing arbitrary time limitson the length of strikes or lockouts. In the preamble to the proposed regulations, the Department also indicatedits intent to provide in the final regulations that notice is due to non-strikersat the site at which the strike is occurring and to provide that the strikes/lockoutsexemption does not apply to plant closings or mass layoffs that occur atother sites as an indirect result of the strike. It also was indicatedthat the regulations would be clarified to indicate that the unforeseeablebusiness circumstances exception may well apply to the indirect effectsof strikes. The Department invited comments on these issues. A number of commenters opposed notice to non-strikers. The commenters gavea number of reasons for their opposition, including: (1) The NLRA onlyrequires a union to provide 60 days' notice of contract termination ormodification and thus the employer may not know that the strike might happenin time to give WARN notice. (2) The NLRA requires employers to negotiatein good faith and notice might be used as evidence of a lack of good faith.(3) The strike or lockout will generally be for 6 months or less and noticewill not be required. (4) The type of employment loss that will occur ina strike situation is not the same type that WARN was intended to address,i.e., the kind of loss that requires planning to get a new job or training.(5) Requiring notice will lead to ``preventive'' notices or to rollingor periodic notices that WARN seeks to avoid. (6) Since the union alonedecides to strike, it makes no sense that Congress intended to cover thissituation; also, it would require notice to the union that initiated thestrike. (7) Requiring notice to non-strikers gives unions a powerful weaponto expand the impact of strikes and is inconsistent with WARN's philosophyof neutrality with respect to labor law. While the Department recognizes that the comments raise several good policyarguments for application of the strikes/lockouts exemption to non-strikers,at least at the plant at which the strike occurs, the Department believesthat the legislative history is clear that non-strikers were intended toreceive notice. During the Senate debates on the bill, Sen. Quayle offeredan amendment that would have extended the exemption to non-strikers. (134CONG. REC. S8667 (daily ed. June 28, 1988) (remarks of See Quayle)). Sen.Metzenbaum, the floor manager of the bill, opposed the amendment and itwas defeated. (134 CONG. REC. S8669 (daily ed. June 28, 1988) (remarksof Sen. Metzenbaum)). The final regulations contain language making itclear that notice is due to non-strikers. Where a union which is on strikerepresents more than one bargaining unit at a single site, non-strikersinclude the non-striking bargaining unit(s). Notice is also due to thoseworkers who are not part of the bargaining unit which is involved in thelabor negotiations that led to the lockout.The Department notes that if, as a commenter pointed out, most strikesdo not last over 6 months, no notice is required under WARN for temporarylayoffs that last 6 months or less. Employers should exercise care in decidingnot to give notice for this reason in a strike situation, since, as discussedearlier, WARN does apply if the layoff is extended beyond 6 months andthe extension is not caused by business circumstances not reasonably foreseeableat the time the layoff was announced. Commenters also urged, if the strikes/lockouts exemption is not to applyto plants other than the plant at which the strike is occurring, that theregulations state that the unforeseeable business circumstances basis forreduced notice applies. The Department agrees that it is generally thecase that strikes will not be foreseeable. The Department also acknowledgesthat the unforeseeable business circumstances exception to the 60-day noticerequirement may well be applicable in most situations where a strike haseffects at other plants, either other plants of the same employer or otherplants of other employers. The unforeseeable business circumstances exceptionequally may apply to the plant at which the strike is occurring. The Departmentalso notes that the ``faltering company'' exception may also apply in strike/lockoutsituations and has modified the final regulation accordingly. The final regulations have been revised to make it clear that the exemptiondoes not apply to the effects of strikes or lockouts at plants other thanthose at which the strike or lockout actually is occurring and to makeit clear that the unforeeable business circumstances exception to the 60-daynotice requirement may be applicable to these direct and indirect effectsand to layoffs at the struck plant.(7) Section 639.6 Who Must Receive Notice Notice must be given to affected employees' representatives, directly tounrepresented affected employees, to the State dislocated worker unit,and to the chief elected official of the unit of local government. Section639.6 of the regulations clarifies who is to receive notice in each case.The prefatory paragraph describes the general rule and discusses the provisionin section 2(b)(1) of WARN relating to the status of employees of the sellerin a sale of all or part of the business. This discussion has been revisedto make it clear that the provision preserves notice rights, but createsno other employment rights and that the technical termination that maybe deemed to occur upon the consummation of the sale does not, in itself,create notice rights. Other than the comments relating to the businesssale provisions of WARN, already discussed in the review of andSection; 639.4(c)of these regulations, there were no comments on this section and no otherrevisions have been made.<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.6(a) Notice to Representatives of Affected Employees</ITAG>This section states the rule that notice must be served on the chief electedofficial of the exclusive representative or bargaining agent representingaffected employees. It also recommends that, if this person is not an officialof the affected local union, notice also be served on the local official.Commenters suggested that the regulations be revised to clarify that ifan employer provides notices to a union, it is not required to providenotice to the individual workers represented by the union or liable ifthese workers do not receive notice. DOL agrees that both these propositionsare correct, but believes that the regulations adequately cover these points.A commenter suggested that the regulations clarify that in right to workStates, notice to the union is effective as notice to both the membersof the union and to those non-members who it represents. Another commentersuggested that non-members of a union should receive individual notice.The Department agrees with the first comment, although it applies in non-rightto work States as well. The Department believes that this duty to representnon-members in appropriate situations is inherent in the definition of``representative'' in andSection; 639.3(d) of this Part. WARN provides that,where there is a representative of affected employees as of the time ofnotice, an employer must provide notice to that representative rather thandirectly to the workers. Thus, the second suggestion would not be appropriate.Commenters suggested that an employer should be required to give noticeonly to one individual on behalf of a union. While this proposition isgenerally correct, there may be situations in which a collective bargainingagreement recognizes more than one entity, for example, both a nationaland a local union, as the exclusive representative. In such cases, noticeto the chief elected officer of both entities would be required.A commenter suggested that the regulations should provide that a unionmust give notice to the affected employees it represents within 3-5 daysand that a penalty should be imposed upon the union for failure to givenotice. WARN contains no provisions imposing any notice obligations onunions. The suggestion cannot, therefore, be adopted.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.6(b)  Notice to Affected Employees </ITAG>This section has been substantially revised in accordance with the previousdiscussion of the comments on notice to ``bumpees'' under andSection; 639.3(e).The final regulations provide that notice is required to be given to employeeswho may reasonably be expected to experience an employment loss, includingthose workers who lose their jobs because of bumping rights and other factors,to the extent that they can be identified at the time notice is requiredto be given. If, at the time notice is required to be given, the employercannot identify the employee who may reasonably be expected to experiencean employment loss due to the elimination of a particular position, itis acceptable for the employer to provide notice to the incumbent in thatposition. The rule also provides that affected employees entitled to noticeinclude part-time as well as full-time employees, since WARN specificallyexcludes part-time employees from being counted for threshold determinationpurposes but does not exclude them otherwise. It is clear that such factors as voluntary separations, early retirementsand transfers which occur after notice is given may make it difficult todetermine which employees will actually experience employment loss. Commentersasked if, in a situation where it is uncertain who will be terminated orlaid off, it is acceptable to give notice to more employees than will actuallyexperience employment loss. Where it is not possible at the time noticeis required to be given to determine who may reasonably be expected toexperience employment loss, it may also be adviseable for an employer togive notice to other workers who may lose their jobs as the result of theseniority system, both to forewarn them and to avoid potential liability.However, it is not appropriate for an employer to provide blanket noticeto workers. As noted earlier, intermediate bumpees need not receive noticeif they have bumping rights they can exercise. A commenter suggested that the regulations be clear that there is no obligationto notify employees of independent contractors and that such employeesare not included in the ``employee count'' for threshold determinationpurposes. The Department concludes that this principle is adequately coveredin the definition of ``affected employee'' in andSection; 639.3(e). A commenter opposed any requirement of giving notice to part-time employees.For the reasons just stated, DOL disagrees that part-time employees arenot entitled to notice; part-time employees have the same need to findother work or training as full-time workers.<ITAG tagnum="81">(c) Section 639.6(c) Notice to the State Dislocated Worker Unit</ITAG>States are required, under section 311(b)(2) of the Job Training PartnershipAct and section 6305(a) of EDWAA, to have operating disclocated workerunits as of July 1, 1989. To meet the requirement for notice to these unitsbefore they become fully operational and to permit States to set in motionexisting worker adjustment assistance programs, the regulations specifythat notice served upon the State Governor constitutes service upon theState dislocated worker unit. A commenter suggested that service on the Governor should be sufficientservice on the State dislocated worker unit and that DOL should publisha list of State dislocated worker units. DOL believes that the regulationsprovide appropriate recognition of the fact that all States will not havefinally set up their dislocated worker units by the time these regulationsare published and of the need for service of notice on the unit at thesame time that workers or their unions get notice so that the States canengage in the rapid response activities that are stressed under EDWAA.<ITAG tagnum="81">(d) Section 639.6(d) Notice to the Chief Elected Official of the AffectedUnit of Local Government </ITAG>Questions were raised about the identity of the chief elected officialof a unit of local government, given the variety of local government structures.In particular, clarification was sought in the situation where local governmentis run by an elected board. The regulations clarify this situation by providingthat the chairperson of the elected board is to receive notice. (8) <T3>Section 639.7 Content of Notice </T3><ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.7(a) Notice Must Be Specific </ITAG>The proposed regulations provide that notice must be specific, that conditionalnotice may be given in certain circumstances and that notice must containall of the elements required by the regulations. The provision on conditional notice provoked numerous comments. Severalcommenters supported this provision of the regulations. Other commentersopposed it, claiming that the WARN language about ordering plant closingsmeans that notice must be unconditional and must be about a definite event.They also argued that if an event is not foreseeable 60 days in advance,the unforeseeable business circumstances exception should apply to it.The commenters argued that conditional notice under WARN could be usedto legitimate kinds of notice which could be illegal under the NLRA. Thesecommenters raised concerns that a conditional notice requirement couldlead to ``rolling'' or overbroad notice and to liability for employerswho fail to give conditional notice. They suggested that optional noticeproviding useful information to workers should be encouraged. While acknowledging these views, there may nonetheless be situations inwhich a plant closing or mass layoff are quite foreseeable if a known event,such as the non-renewal of a contract, occurs. If the event and the consequencesare foreseeable, the unforeseeable business circumstances exception cannotbe available. If notice can be given only when the necessity of the layoffbecomes definite, the employer cannot avoid liability. The Department believesthat the best remedy for the problem is to permit contingent notice tocover these cases. The final regulations have, therefore, been revisedto permit optional conditional notice to serve as compliance with WARN,while narrowing the definition so that the commenters' concerns are ameliorated.Thus, conditional notice is permitted only if there is a definite event,like the renewal of a major contract, the consequences of the occurrenceor non-occurrence of which will definitely lead to a covered plant closingor mass layoff less than 60 days after the event. The final regulationsprovide that conditional notice may not be used to legitimate notices whichwould be violations of other laws. Further, the regulations specify thatconditional notice is optional to avoid the problem of imposing liabilityon employers for failing to give a conditional notice. An example of a situation in which conditional notice might be applicablewas provided by one commenter, a utility. The commenter operates a nuclearpower plant which is the subject of some opposition. A referendum is scheduledto take place to decide whether the utility should continue to operatethe plant. If the voters decide that the plant should be closed, the utilitymay have to begin terminating workers fairly quickly after the referendumoccurs. In these circumstances, if a schedule of layoffs can be determined60 days in advance of the first layoff, conditional notice may be advisable.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 639.7(b)-(f) Elements of Notice </ITAG>These sections in the proposed rule prescribed the elements which mustbe included in the notices to each of the individuals or entities who areentitled to receive notice. A number of commenters argued that the proposedrule imposed too many requirements on employers and went beyond the requirementsof the Act. Comments were, in fact, received on each and every elementof the notice. The commenters argued that WARN does not require a specificform of notice and that only simple notice is required under the Act; thatthe requirements can create other grounds for suit for technical violationsof the requirements; that the requirements will discourage employers fromproviding longer notice and from voluntary compliance. On the specificelements of notice, the commenters were particularly opposed to any requirementthat a specific date be given, claiming that employers cannot anticipatea specific date when a layoff will take place 60 or more days in advance.The commenters also opposed identification of the workers involved (innotice to unions) claiming that complex seniority systems made such identificationdifficult. One commenter supported all the elements of notice specifiedin the regulation and suggested that the name and address of a companycontact person be included in the notice to affected employees. While the Act does not enumerate specific elements which should be includedin the advance written notice of an order for a plant closing or a masslayoff, the purpose of providing notice to the parties mentioned in theAct is to allow each of them to take appropriate action to facilitate training,employment or other adjustments for affected employees. The content ofnotice to each party is designed to provide information necessary for eachof them to take responsible action. The information requested is not difficultto obtain and care was taken to keep the elements of notice to a minimum.Nonetheless, DOL has reexamined the regulations to ensure that the noticerequirements are not overly burdensome on employers while providing sufficientinformation to permit the other actors in the WARN process to receive thefull protection intended by the Act and to perform their functions. Severalchanges, including clarifying language changes, have been made in the finalregulations. In recognition of the difficulty of identifying specific separationdates for individuals 60 days in advance, the final regulations providefor a 14-day period of flexibility. An employer may give a specific separationdate, the beginning date of a 14-day period during which the separationis expected to occur or a combination of specific dates and 14-day periods,if appropriate. This revision applies to the dates in the individual workers'notices and to the date or schedule of dates in notices to representativesand government units. In the final regulations prescribing the elements of notice to unions,the first and last elements have been combined. The requirement that unionsbe notified of the identity of other affected unions, the requirement thatemployers provide the number of affected employees and the requirementfor a statement about applicable bumping rights have been eliminated. In the final regulations prescribing notice to affected employees, therequirement that the notice state the name and address of the plant hasbeen eliminated and a requirement that the employer provide the name andtelephone number of a company contact person has been added. The notice provisions for the State dislocated worker unit and the chiefelected official of the affected local government have been combined intoone paragraph in the final regulation, although separate notices stillare required by WARN for each. The first and last elements of notice havebeen combined and the provision about the statement of bumping rights hasbeen clarified. In all of the notices, the requirement that the notice identify whetherthe proposed action is a plant closing or mass layoff also has been eliminatedand the requirement has been revised to require that the employer statewhether the planned action is temporary or permanent and, if applicable,to state that the entire single site of employment will be closed.A new provision has been added to provide an alternative form of noticeto the State dislocated worker unit and to the chief elected official ofthe affected local government. Under this alternative, an employer mayprovide an abbreviated notice to these parties which states the name andaddress of the plant at which the action is to take place, the name andtelephone number of a company contact person, the first data on which anemployment action is expected to take place, and the number of affectedemployees. All other information required by the regulation must be maintainedby the employer at a readily accessible place for use by the State dislocatedworker unit and the local government. DOL believes that this alternativeprovides a reasonable way to ease some of the perceived burden on employers.DOL believes that the remaining elements of notice are important if theparties are to receive notice which will provide them with the informationthey need to take the appropriate actions to minimize the effects of theaffected employees' employment loss. The name and address of the plantand of a contact person provides basic information to identify the employerwho is giving notice, the place at which the plant closing and mass layoffwill occur and someone to provide them with additional information, ifneeded. The date of the layoff or schedule of layoff dates is essentialto enable all recipients of notice to understand when employment lossesactually will occur. Whether the planned action is permanent or temporaryand the date on which it is to occur are important pieces of informationto enable workers and service providers to plan and to make decisions aboutwhat kind of services workers may need and when the services will be needed.The job titles of the positions to be eliminated and the names of the workersholding those positions (or the numbers of workers for the State dislocatedworker unit and the local government) enable unions and service providersto quickly identify the workers who will be affected and the size and scopeof the action and the services needed to respond to it. The statement aboutwhether bumping rights exist enables the governmental actors to determinethat the workers who will actually need services may be difficult to determineat the outset. The name of each union representing affected employees,and the name and address of the chief elected officer of each union inthe notices to State dislocated worker units and local governments is neededfor the governmental actors to be able to contact the unions with whichthey will work to provide services. The statement about whether the entireplant will close provides needed information about job and general economicprospects in the local community and enables workers and the State andlocal governments to more accurately gauge the kinds of actions that willbe needed. DOL also agrees with commenters who were concerned that technical errorsin providing the information required in the regulation could lead to claimsthat employers violated the Act. Language has been added to the final regulation,in andSection; 639.7(a)(3), to make it clear that the notice must containthe best information available to the employer when the notice is given.The intent of adding this language is to attempt to prevent claims thatmight arise when an employer makes what turns out to be a factual errorbecause circumstances later changed. DOL recognizes that in developingnotices, considerable amounts of information may be required to be reviewedand considered by employers. While the Department expects employers touse their best efforts to be accurate in providing the information requiredby the regulations, DOL also recognizes that minor, inadvertent errorsmay be made. The final regulations provide that such minor errors shouldnot be the basis for liability. DOL notes that it is not the intent of WARN to interfere with collectivebargaining contract provisions calling for notice to employees or theirunions in advance of WARN's 60-day notice period. The content of noticerequirements provide for some flexibility where this situation exists.Such long term notice need not contain all the elements required by thissection as long as the remaining information is provided in writing 60days in advance of the covered action. For example, where such long-termnotice is given that otherwise includes all required notice elements butdoes not identify a definite termination date or 14-day period, the givingof an additional notice specifying a termination date or 14-day period60 days in advance of that date or period constitutes full compliance withWARN.In andSection; 639.7(d) of the proposed regulations, prescribing the requirementsof notice to affected workers, the regulations require that the noticebe ``in language understandable to the employee''. Several commenters suggestedthat this statement be revised to make it clear that there is no requirementthat notice be in a language other than English. Other commenters askedthat the regulations be clarified to reflect that the standard is thatthe notice be understandable to the average worker. It was not DOL's intentionthat the regulations require that notices be in a language other than Englishand the Department does not believe that the language of the proposed regulationsuggests such a requirement, so no change has been made. Employers should,however, be aware that under various civil rights laws, notices of variouskinds have been required to be given in languages other than English wheresubstantial numbers of recipients of those notices primarily speak anotherlanguage. Employers whose workforces contain large numbers of such workersmay wish to consider whether to provide notices in a language other thanEnglish. The Department agrees with those commenters who suggest a standardof understandability to the average worker and has changed the word ``employee''to ``employees'' to make this point clearer.(9) Section 639.8 How Is Notice To Be ServedThis section provides that any reasonable method of serving notice is acceptable,as long as the intended recipient has the notice in hand 60 days beforethe separation occurs. Additionally, the regulation indicates that a ticketednotice fails to meet the requirements of WARN.Commenters suggested that rules should be added to state when mailed noticeis deemed to be timely mailed or that mailed notice is deemed served onthe date it is postmarked. Commenters also asked that the regulations statethat a notice sent in a pay envelope is deemed to be served on the dateof the payday on which it is to be delivered. Since WARN and the regulationfocus on receipt of the notice and since the time it will take for mailednotice to be received will vary with local conditions and with the locationof the recipient, DOL does not believe that any additional rule for whennotice is deemed served is appropriate. Employers should mail notice farenough in advance, given local mail conditions, so that the notice willbe received 60 days in advance of the date of the plant closing or masslayoff. Section 8(b) of WARN specifies that mailing notice to the employee'slast known address or inserting notice in the employee's paycheck are acceptablemethods of service. DOL does not view this language as requiring that eachemployee actually receive notice 60 days in advance of a covered eventas long as the method of service is timed so that the employees generallyreceive timely notice. For the same reason, deeming notice to be servedwhen postmarked will not ensure timely delivery. Similarly, because noticeserved by insertion in a pay envelope may be delivered or mailed or directlydeposited in the worker's bank account with a pay stub being deliveredlater, DOL does not think that an absolute rule deeming notice to be servedon the payday on which the paycheck is to be delivered is appropriate.(10) <T3>Section 639.9 When May Notice Be Given Less Than 60 Day in Advance</T3>The prefatory paragraph of the proposed regulation indicates that threeexceptions to giving a full 60 days' notice exist and that they are tobe construed narrowly. The paragraph also states that they are to be construednarrowly. The paragraph also states that if one of the exceptions is invoked,the employer must still give as much notice as is practicable, and mustgive notice containing a brief statement of the reason of the reason forgiving less than 60 day's notice and the elements of notice required inandSection; 639.7.Several commenters disagreed with the statement that all the exceptionsshould be narrowly construed. Some of these commenters cited specific aspectsof the legislative history to show that the unforeseeable business circumstancesand natural disaster exceptions should not be narrowly construed. The Departmenthas reviewed the legislative history and agrees that it may not have beenappropriate to say that the unforeseeable business circumstances and naturaldisaster exceptions should be narrowly construed. While the ConferenceReport on H.R. 3 (H.R. Rep. No. 100-576, 100th Cong., 2nd Sess., 1049 (April20, 1988)) may be read to suggest a narrow construction of the unforeseeablebusiness circumstances exception because of the various requirements forproving the applicability of the exception that appear in the report, thedebates on the bill suggest that the exception was not intended to be narrowlyconstrued. (133 CONG. REC. S9435 (daily ed. July 8, 1987) (remarks of Sen.Kennedy); 134 CONG. REC. S8856, S8857 (daily ed. July 6, 1988) (remarksof Sen. Metzenbaum); 134 CONG. REC. H2370 (daily ed. April 21, 1988) (remarksof Cong. Ford); see also H.R. Rep. No. 100-285, 100th Cong., 1st Sess.,16, 34-35 (August 8, 1987)). Particularly significant are the continuedreferences to the exception when questions were raised about how the billwould work. The legislative history does indicate that the faltering companyexception ws intended to be narrowly construed. (H.R. Rep. No. 100-576,100th Cong., 2nd Sess., 1048 (April 20, 1988)). In the final regulations,the reference to narrow construction has been deleted from the prefatoryparagraph. In andSection; 639.9(b), covering the unforeseeable business circumstancesexception, the definition of what constitutes an unforeseeable businesscircumstance has been revised to be more in line with the language of theConference Report by the addition of the word ``dramatic''. The languagein andSection; 639.9(a), discussion the faltering company exception has beenrevised to indicate that exception should be narrowly construed.<ITAG tagnum="81">(a) Section 639.9(a) The ``Faltering Company'' Exception</ITAG>This section describes the ``faltering company'' exception in the languageof the Conference Report. (<T3>Id.</T3>). This exception requires that an employer must have beenactively seeking capital or business at the time 60-day notice was dueto be given, that there must have been a realistic chance to obtain thecapital or business; that if the capital or business were obtained it wouldhave been sufficient to keep the business operating for a reasonable periodof time; and that the employer must have believed in good faith that givingnotice 60 days in advance would have precluded the employer from obtainingthe needed capital or business. The regulation also provides that the employer'sfinancial situation will be viewed in a company-wide context.A commenter suggested that the test for the ``faltering company'' exceptionshould be whether ``similarly situated employers would have followed asimilar course of action'' and that the regulation should clearly statethat failure to obtain the capital or business is not a factor under thetest. DOL believes that the first point is correct, or, stated anotherway, that an employer must demonstrate that it exercised ``commerciallyreasonable business judgment'' in its actions. The Department believesthat the regulations reflect this standard and has not changed them. Thecommenter's second point is confusing since the exception requires thatthe business or financing must have been sufficient to keep the companyor the plant open for some reasonable time. Thus, the need for notice willonly be triggered if the employer fails to obtain the business or financingit seeks.Another commenter, representing the food marketing industry, objected tothe language that the ``faltering company exception will be viewed in acompany-wide context''. The commenter argued that since retail grocerystores operate on slim profit margins, closing one store may save othersand under the regulatory language that would not be possible. DOL doesnot think this language must be read as narrowly as the commenter does.Congress was concerned with situations in which a company has substantialassets or cash which it simply chooses not to use to save a faltering branch.If the whole position of the company shows that the closing of one branchto save others was a reasonable business judgment, the faltering companyexception is available. It should also be noted that, in some circumstances,it may be appropriate for a company to make a judgment not to use its otherassets to save a branch. In this case, the company simply cannot availitself of the faltering company exception and it must give 60 days' notice.The same commenter suggested a broad reading of the ``faltering company''exception so that grocery stores that run sales and try to attract customerscan avail themselves of the exception. The commenter argued that falteringstores will lose employees and customers if they give notice, which willbecome a self-fulfilling prophecy. The commenter also suggested that theregulations should address cases in which secured creditors intervene andforce the closing or sale of one or more stores or in which creditors seektime to sell the business before foreclosing.The Department believes that the suggestion about running sales is toobroad for general application. Any business can make a general claim itwas seeking more customers or orders. The faltering company exception requiressome more specific efforts to get customers. If the store can show an unusuallygreat effort to attract customers and that there was valid reason to believethat the customers would abandon the store if they knew it would close,the exemption would appear to apply. On the questions about actions bysecured creditors, DOL thinks that if it can be shown that the creditorsdo not want their efforts to be known, the exception would apply.One commenter suggested that since WARN section 3(b)(3) merely requiresthe employer to give a brief statement of the reasons for giving less than60 days' notice, the regulations should follow the burden of proof modelof Title VII of the Civil Rights Act and impose the burden on the challengingparty to prove that the claim of exception was a pretext if the employerproffers a sworn statement as part of the notice process. The commenteralso suggested that the rule should define the terms ``good faith'' and``reasonable''. The commenter also asserted that the rules create a muchtougher standard than Congress intended. DOL notes that the language theregulation comes directly from the Conference Report, and that the statementsabout the burden of proof are a reasonable interpretation of the Report'sstatements that the employer must show that various of the elements ofthe exception are met. (<T3>Id</T3>). DOL does not think that the Title VII model is appropriatesince, in the case of the assertion of an exception to full notice, theemployer is in the position of the proponent of an affirmative defense,i.e., the employer must prove that it is entitled to use the exception.DOL believes that, by referring to ``commercially reasonable business judgments'',the regulations do define ``reasonable'' and ``good faith'' in the contextof the faltering company exception.Another commenter asserted that the narrowness of the ``faltering company''exception will preclude any unionized company from using it because itcould lead to onerous information disclosure requirements under the NLRA.While the Department is not the agency charged with expertise with respectto the NLRA, DOL believes that the regulations accurately reflect the statutorylanguage and Congressional intent.<ITAG tagnum="81">(b) Section 636.9(b) The ``Unforeseeable Business Circumstances''Exception</ITAG>This section also draws its language from the Conference Report on H.R.3. (<T3>Id</T3>.) The regulations define the exception as applying to circumstancesthat are not reasonably foreseeable at the time 60 days' notice would havebeen required. The regulation cites some examples of events which mightbe unforeseeable business circumstances. It focuses the test for determiningwhether business circumstances were reasonably unforeseeable on the employer'scommercially reasonable business judgment.A commenter suggested that the test for the application of the unforeseeablebusiness circumstances exception is that an event could not ``reasonably''have been foreseen and that reasonableness should be determined on an objectivestandard. The Department agrees with this formulation and believes thatthe regulations provide an objective test by focusing on the commercialreasonableness of the employer's actions. The same commenter pointed out that the unforeseeable business circumstancesexception still requires that an employer give as much notice as feasible.DOL agrees and has so provided in the regulation. The same commenter pointed out the provision in the Conference Report thatthe exception applies only where ``it is not economically feasible to requirethe employer to give notice and wait until the end of the notice periodbefore effecting the plant closing or mass layoff'' (<T3>id.</T3>) and asserted that the burden is on the employer to provefeasiblity. The Department believes that the quoted language simply describesan element of the factual predicate that must extist for an event to bean unforeseeable business circumstance; but does not create any kind ofseparate test. DOL believes that the quoted language merely requires anemployer to show that a ``sudden, dramatic and unexpected'' event occurredwhich precipitated a covered employment action, which, in light of thecircumstances at that plant, could not have been postponed. The test ofwhether the action could have been postponed is one of commercially reasonablebusiness judgment. The Deparment solicited comments on examples of unforeseeable businesscircumstances that might be included in the regulations as illustratingprinciples applicable to employers generally, and the circumstances inwhich they might apply. Commenters suggested that DOL include as examplesof unforeseeable business circumstances strikes or lockouts elsewhere,loss of or failure to award contracts, unexpected major market downturns,fires, changes in prices and costs, declines in customer orders, Stateand local regulatory changes, cases in which layoffs become larger thanoriginally expected, loss of raw materials, loss of financing, legislation,court decisions, unavailability of a ship to be repaired, force majeure,actions related to public health and safety, other, and ``secondary effectsof economic conditions''. While the commenters did not respond to the secondpart of the invitation and state any generally applicable principles, DOLagrees that many of these factors may constitute unforeseeable businesscircumstances, and has included four examples in the regulations. What emerges from consideration of the variety of factors mentioned bythe commenters is that it is not appropriate to develop a rule definingcertain conditions as <T3>per se </T3>unforeseeable business circumstances. While many of thefactors suggested by the commenters will, in most cases, be unforeseeablebusiness circumstances, for example, strikes at another plant of the samecompany, one can conceive of situations in which they would not be reasonablyunforeseeable, as where the strike is part of a union busting strategy.Some of the factors mentioned do not seem unforeseeable in many cases.For example, regulatory changes are often preceded by lengthy notice andcomment procedures, often have delayed effective dates and sometimes havetime to attain compliance built in. The effects of such regulations willnot be unforeseeable. The same is true of legislation, which often hasdelayed effective dates and is the suject of lengthy public debate. Similarly,while the timing and content of court decisions may not be foreseeable60 days in advance, the execution of the judgement may be delayed for along time for a variety of reasons and prudent businessmen make provisionfor the consequences of adverse judgments. Finally, loss of contracts,particularly government contracts may be preceded by notice and by theopportunity to respond. (It also must be pointed out that DOL does notunderstand the last of the factors listed and does not mean to suggestapproval of this factor.) What is important is that the circumstance be ``sudden, dramatic and unexpected''.Each claim of unforeseeable business circumstances must be examined onits own merits, in these terms and in terms of whether the employer reasonably(exercising commercially reasonably business judgment) could not foreseethat the even would occur or that it would have the effects it had. The FHLBB suggested that persons or institutions that take over ailingsavings and loan institutions should be considered covered under the unforeseeablebusiness circumstances exception since they may not know all of the problemsthey face in taking over the ailing institution. While there will be circumstancesin which surprise discoveries of bad debts or assets may require coveredemployment actions to be ordered in less than 60 days and where the unforeseeablebusiness circumstances exception will clearly apply, the Department cannotagree to a blanket application of the exception. These buyers must exercisecommercially reasonable business judgement in discovering the problemsof the institution it is acquiring and in deciding what employment actionsto take in light of these problems; they may not simply rely on the factthat their action was assisted by the Federal Government. <ITAG tagnum="81">(c) Section 639.9(c) The ``Natural Disaster'' Exception </ITAG>This section discusses the exemption for plant closings and mass layoffscaused by natural disasters. The regulation lists some of the conditionsthat are natural disasters. It provides that the natural disaster exceptionapplies to the direct results of a natural disaster, while the indirectresults of a natural disaster may be covered under the unforeseeable businesscircumstances exception. It also provides that notice must be providedwhen a natural disaster causes a covered closing or layoff, even if thenotice is after the fact. Several commenters opposed the provision of the regulations that appliesthe natural disaster exception only to events directly caused by naturaldisasters. These commenters cited remarks in the floor debates by the sponsorof the natural disaster exception amendment suggesting that the exceptionapplies to the ``downstream'' effects of natural disasters. (134 CONG.REC. S8687 (daily ed. June 28, 1988) (remarks of Sen. Dole)). These commentersdid not discuss the entire debate on the amendment. The amendment originallyoffered specifically included the direct and indirect effects of naturaldisasters. (<T3>Id. </T3>at S8686). The floor manager opposed the amendment becauseof the language about indirect effects. (<T3>Id. </T3>at S8687 (remarks of Sen. Metzenbaum). The amendment was withdrawn,the language stricken and the amendment accepted. (<T3>Id. </T3>at S8688). DOL thinks that the legislative history, consideredin its entirety, supports the position taken in the proposed regulationsand no change has been made in the final regulations.Other commenters objected to the requirement that after the fact noticebe given when a natural disaster causes a plant closing or mass layoff.In this regard, the statutory language may be confusing. The natural disasterexception, section 3(b)(2)(A), begins with the words ``[n]o notice underthis Act shall be required''. On the other hand, the final subsection ofsection 3(b) of WARN, section 3(b)(3), which, by its terms, applies tothe entire section, to all the exceptions, requires that as much noticeas practicable be given when one of the exceptions is invoked. The Departmentbelieves that the approach that it has decided upon is the best approachin this ambiguous situation since it is consistent with the needs of workersto have information on whether their jobs will continue to exist and howlong they may be without work and thus is consistent with the intent ofWARN to provide such information to workers. The final regulation has beenrevised to conform to the statutory language and to make it clear thatsuch after the fact notice need only contain such information as is availableto the employer at the time the notice is given. (11) Section 639.10 When May Notice Be Extended This section covers the length of time after the date (or the ending dateof the 14-day period) specified in the notice for which the notice is valid.To ensure that the parties who are due notice have the most current andhelpful data available and, thus, can make appropriate plans, additionalnotice is due if the original date or the ending date of the 14-day periodis not met. If the postponement is for less than 60 days, the notice needonly contain a reference to the earlier notice, the date to which the plannedaction is postponed, and the reasons for the postponement. This type ofnotice will provide the parties with needed information and be less burdensometo the employer. If the postponement extends for 60 days or more, the additionalnotice should be treated as new notice and meet the specified requirements.Several commenters disagreed with this interpretation, arguing that thereis no specific statutory requirement to support it; that a 180-day periodis more in keeping with the rolling 90-day aggregation period for determiningemployment loss under section 3(d); that if any ``secondary'' notice isrequired, posting general notice on a bulletin board should be sufficient;that the reasons for extending the layoff date may not enable the employerto make precise calculations of how long the plant may remain open; andthat such notices might require the disclosure of confidential information.One commenter supported the approach taken in the regulations and suggestedthat the regulations make it clear that the short term, less than 60-daypostponement notice is mandatory. DOL believes that the approach it has adopted is most consistent with Congressionalintent in two important respects. First, it furthers the Congressionalpurpose that notice to workers provide the workers and governmental authoritieswith specific information in order to react to a dislocation event andto obtain new employment or training to minimize the effects of that event.If workers are not informed of changes in planned termination dates theirplanning will be disrupted and either they will run the risk of losingother opportunities or the employer will lose employees who it may needto carry on its operations. Secondly, DOL's approach is in accord withCongress' express intent to prohibit rolling notice. (134 CONG. REC. S8680(daily ed. June 28, 1988) (remarks of Sens. Kennedy and Metzenbaum)). TheDepartment also notes that some of the concerns expressed by the commenterswill be ameliorated by the provision that notices can identify a 14-dayperiod during which the layoff may take place. The Department does recognizethat the notice of short term postponements can create a burden on employers.The final regulations have, therefore, been revised to make it clear thatany form of notice or method of providing the information about a postponementfor less than 60 days is acceptable as long as the information about thepostponement is effectively communicated to all the affected workers. A commenter asked the following questions about the application of thisprovision. If an employer gave notice on January 1, 1989 of a layoff scheduledfor December 31, 1989 and then realizes on December 15, 1989 that it cankeep open until January 15, 1990, is notice required to be given and, ifso, must it be 60 days' notice? Under the regulations, the employer isnot required to give a new 60-day notice for a 15-day postponement; butit is required to inform its employers of the postponement in any reasonableway which will get the information to all affected workers. The commenteralso asked if a new 60-day notice was required on November 1, 1989 if theemployer adheres to the original closing date. The answer is no in thecircumstances stated. One notice is sufficient no matter how far in advanceit is given if it contains the information required in section 639.7. (12) Effective Date Several commenters continued to oppose DOL's ``interpretation'' of theeffective date. These commenters suggested that the final regulations shouldadopt a definition of the effective date provision of section 11 of WARNthat requires notice to begin to be given on the February 4, 1989 effectivedate of WARN for plant closings or mass layoffs that occur on April 5,1989. DOL believes that the course it took in the preamble to the proposedregulations was the most correct and appropriate one. DOL recognized thatthere were three supportable interpretations of the effective date provision.The Department chose not to adopt any interpretation but simply to informemployers of the interpretations and of their possible liability. DOL continuesto believe that the issue of the meaning of the effective date is a purelylegal issue that the courts will decide without giving any deference toany interpretation that DOL might adopt. Thus, any interpretation thatmight be adopted possibly could mislead employers to their detriment. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact</ITAG>The final rule interprets the provisions of the Worker Adjustment and RetrainingNotification Act. It does not have the financial or other impact to makeit a major rule and, therefore, preparation of a regulatory impact analysisis not necessary. See Executive Order No. 12291, 5 U.S.C. 601 Note.At the time the interim interpretative and proposed rules were published,the Department of Labor notified the Chief Counsel for Advocacy, SmallBusiness Administration, and made the certification pursuant to the RegulatoryFlexibility Act at 5 U.S.C. 605(b), that the rule would not have a significanteconomic impact on a significant number of small entities. No significanteconomic impact would be imposed by the rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>Pursuant to the Paperwork Reduction Act, information collection requirementsimposed by these regulations have been approved by the Office of Managementand Budget as a final rule under OMB No. 1205-0276, expiring December 31,1990.Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto vary from 64 to 168 hours for 960 responses with an average of 112 hoursper response, including the time for reviewing instructions, searchingexisting data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Send comments regarding thisburden estimate or any other aspect of this collection of information,including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Office of InformationManagement, Department of Labor, Room N-1301, 200 Constitution Avenue,NW., Washington, DC 20210; and to the Office of Management and Budget,Paperwork Reduction Project (1205-0276), Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects for 20 CFR Part 639</ITAG>Employment, Labor, Labor management relations, Labor unions, Penalties.<ITAG tagnum="84">Final Rule</ITAG>Accordingly, Chapter V of Title 20, Code of Federal Regulations, is amendedby revising Part 639, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 639_WORKER ADJUSTMENT AND RETRAINING NOTIFICATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.1 Purpose and scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.2 What does WARN require?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.4 Who must give notice?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.5 When must notice be given?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.6 Who must receive notice?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.7 What must the notice contain?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.8 How is the notice served?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.9 When may notice be given less than 60 days in advance?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">639.10 When may notice be extended?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>29 U.S.C. 2107(a).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and scope.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose of WARN. </T3>The Worker Adjustment and Retraining NotificationAct (WARN or the Act) provides protection to workers, their families andcommunities by requiring employers to provide notification 60 calendardays in advance of plant closings and mass layoffs. Advance notice providesworkers and their families some transition time to adjust to the prospectiveloss of employment, to seek and obtain alternative jobs and, if necessary,to enter skill training or retraining that will allow these workers tosuccessfully compete in the job market. WARN also provides for notice toState dislocated worker units so that dislocated worker assistance canbe promptly provided.(b) <T3>Scope of these regulations. </T3>These regulations establish basicdefinitions and rules for giving notice, implementing the provisions ofWARN. The Department's objective is to establish clear principles and broadguidelines which can be applied in specific circumstances. However, theDepartment recognizes that Federal rulemaking cannot address the multitudeof industry and company-specific situations in which advance notice willbe given.(c) <T3>Notice encouraged where not required. </T3>Section 7 of the Act states:<ITAG tagnum="20">It is the sense of Congress that an employer who is not required tocomply with the notice requirements of section 3 should, to the extentpossible, provide notice to its employees about a proposal to close a plantor permanently reduce its workforce.</ITAG>(d) <T3>WARN enforcement. </T3>Enforcement of WARN will be through the courts,as provided in section 5 of the statute. Employees, their representativesand units of local government may initiate civil actions against employersbelieved to be in violation of andSection; 3 of the Act. The Department ofLabor has no legal standing in any enforcement action and, therefore, willnot be in a position to issue advisory opinions of specific cases. TheDepartment will provide assistance in understanding these regulations andmay revise them from time to time as may be necessary.(e) <T3>Notice in ambiguous situations. </T3>It is civically desirable andit would appear to be good business practice for an employer to provideadvance notice to its workers or unions, local government and the Statewhen terminating a significant number of employees. In practical terms,there are some questions and ambiguities of interpretation inherent inthe application of WARN to business practices in the market economy thatcannot be addressed in these regulations. It is therefore prudent for employersto weigh the desirability of advance notice against the possibility ofexpensive and time-consuming litigation to resolve disputes where noticehas not been given. The Department encourages employers to give noticein all circumstances.(f) <T3>Coordination with job placement and retraining programs. </T3>The Department,through these regulations and through the Trade Adjustment Assistance Program(TAA) and Economic Dislocation and Worker Adjustment Assistance Act (EDWAA)regulations, encourages maximum coordination of the actions and activitiesof these programs to assure that the negative impact of dislocation onworkers is lessened to the extent possible. By providing for notice tothe State dislocated worker unit, WARN notice begins the process of assistingworkers who will be dislocated. (g) <T3>WARN not to supersede other laws and contracts. </T3>The provisionsof WARN do not supersede any laws or collective bargaining agreements thatprovide for additional notice or additional rights and remedies. If suchlaw or agreement provides for a longer notice period, WARN notice shallrun concurrently with that additional notice period. Collective bargainingagreements may be used to clarify or amplify the terms and conditions ofWARN, but may not reduce WARN rights. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">What does WARN require? </ITAG>WARN requires employers who are planning a plant closing or a mass layoffto give affected employees at least 60 days' notice of such an employmentaction. While the 60-day period is the minimum for advance notice, thisprovision is not intended to discourage employers from voluntarily providinglonger periods of advance notice. Not all plant closings and layoffs aresubject to the Act, and certain employment thresholds must be reached beforethe Act applies. WARN sets out specific exemptions, and provides for areduction in the notification period in particular circumstances. Damagesand civil penalties can be assessed against employers who violate the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Employer.</T3> (1) The term ``employer'' means any business enterprisethat employs_ (i) 100 or more employees, excluding part-time employees; or (ii) 100 or more employees, including part-time employees, who in the aggregatework at least 4,000 hours per week, exclusive of hours of overtime.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Workers on temporary layoff or on leave who have a reasonable expectationof recall are counted as employees. An employee has a ``reasonable expectationof recall'' when he/she understands, through notification or through industrypractice, that his/her employment with the employer has been temporarilyinterrupted and that he/she will be recalled to the same or to a similarjob. The term ``employer'' includes non-profit organizations of the requisitesize. Regular Federal, State, local and federally recognized Indian tribalgovernments are not covered. However, the term ``employer'' includes publicand quasi-public entities which engage in business (i.e., take part ina commercial or industrial enterprise, supply a service or good on a mercantilebasis, or provide independent management of public assets, raising revenueand making desired investments), and which are separately organized fromthe regular government, which have their own governing bodies and whichhave independent authority to manage their personnel and assets. (2) Under existing legal rules, independent contractors and subsidiarieswhich are wholly or partially owned by a parent company are treated asseparate employers or as a part of the parent or contracting company dependingupon the degree of their independence from the parent. Some of the factorsto be considered in making this determination are (i) common ownership,(ii) common directors and/or officers, (iii) de facto exercise of control,(iv) unity of personnel policies emanating from a common source, and (v)the dependency of operations. (3) Workers, other than part-time workers, who are exempt from notice undersection 4 of WARN are nonetheless counted as employees for purposes ofdetermining coverage as an employer. (4) An employer may have one or more sites of employment under common ownershipor control. An example would be a major auto maker which has dozens ofautomobile plants throughout the country. Each plant would be considereda site of employment, but there is only one ``employer'', the auto maker.(b) <T3>Plant closing</T3>. The term ``plant closing'' means the permanentor temporary shutdown of a ``single site of employment'', or one or more``facilities or operating units'' within a single site of employment, ifthe shutdown results in an ``employment loss'' during <T3>any 30-day period</T3> at the single site of employment for <T3>50 or more</T3> employees, excluding any part-time employees. An employmentaction that results in the effective cessation of production or the workperformed by a unit, even if a few employees remain, is a shutdown. A ``temporaryshutdown'' triggers the notice requirement only if there are a sufficientnumber of terminations, layoffs exceeding 6 months, or reductions in hoursof work as specified under the definition of ``employment loss.''(c) <T3>Mass layoff</T3>. (1) The term ``mass layoff'' means a reduction inforce which first, is not the result of a plant closing, and second, resultsin an employment loss at the single site of employment during <T3>any 30-day period</T3> for:(i) <T3>At least 33 percent</T3> of the active employees, excluding part-timeemployees, and(ii) <T3>At least 50 employees</T3>, excluding part-time employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Where 500 or more employees (excluding part-time employees) are affected,the 33% requirement does not apply, and notice is required if the othercriteria are met. Plant closings involve employment loss which resultsfrom the shutdown of one or more distinct units within a single site orthe entire site. A mass layoff involves employment loss, regardless ofwhether one or more units are shut down at the site.(2) Workers, other than part-time workers, who are exempt from notice undersection 4 of WARN are nonetheless counted as employees for purposes ofdetermining coverage as a plant closing or mass layoff. For example, ifan employer closes a temporary project on which 10 permanent and 40 temporaryworkers are employed, a covered plant closing has occurred although only10 workers are entitled to notice.(d) <T3>Representative</T3>. The term ``representative'' means an exclusiverepresentative of employees within the meaning of section 9(a) or 8(f)of the National Labor Relations Act or section 2 of the Railway Labor Act.(e) <T3>Affected employees</T3>. The term ``affected employees'' means employeeswho may reasonably be expected to experience an employment loss as a consequenceof a proposed plant closing or mass layoff by their employer. This includesindividually identifiable employees who will likely lose their jobs becauseof bumping rights or other factors, to the extent that such individualworkers reasonably can be identified at the time notice is required tobe given. The term ``affected employees'' includes managerial and supervisoryemployees, but does not include business partners. Consultant or contractemployees who have a separate employment relationship with another employerand are paid by that other employer, or who are self-employed, are not``affected employees'' of the business to which they are assigned. In addition,for purposes of determining whether coverage thresholds are met, eitherincumbent workers in jobs being eliminated or, if known 60 days in advance,the actual employees who suffer an employment loss may be counted.(f) <T3>Employment loss</T3>. (1) The term ``employment loss'' means (i) anemployment termination, other than a discharge for cause, voluntary departure,or retirement, (ii) a layoff exceeding 6 months, or (iii) a reduction inhours of work of individual employees of more than 50% during each monthof any 6-month period.(2) Where a termination or a layoff (see paragraphs (f)(1)(i) and (ii)of this section) is involved, an employment loss does not occur when anemployee is reassigned or transferred to employer-sponsored programs, suchas retraining or job search activities, as long as the reassignment doesnot constitute a constructive discharge or other involuntary termination.(3) An employee is not considered to have experienced an employment lossif the closing or layoff is the result of the relocation or consolidationof part or all of the employer's business and, prior to the closing orlayoff_(i) The employer offers to transfer the employee to a different site ofemployment within a reasonable commuting distance with no more than a 6-monthbreak in employment, or(ii) The employer offers to transfer the employee to any other site ofemployment regardless of distance with no more than a 6-month break inemployment, and the employee accepts within 30 days of the offer or ofthe closing or layoff, whichever is later.(4) A ``relocation or consolidation'' of part or all of an employer's business,for purposes of paragraph andSection; 639.3(h)(4), means that some definablebusiness, whether customer orders, product lines, or operations, is transferredto a different site of employment and that transfer results in a plantclosing or mass layoff.(g) <T3>Unit of local government</T3>. The term ``unit of local government''means any general purpose political subdivision of a State, which has thepower to levy taxes and spend funds and which also has general corporateand police powers. When a covered employment site is located in more thanone unit of local government, the employer must give notice to the unitto which it determines it directly paid the highest taxes for the yearpreceding the year for which the determination is made. All local taxesdirectly paid to the local government should be aggregated for this purpose.(h) <T3>Part-time employee</T3>. The term ``part-time'' employee means an employeewho is employed for an average of fewer than 20 hours per week or who hasbeen employed for fewer than 6 of the 12 months preceding the date on whichnotice is required, including workers who work full-time. This term mayinclude workers who would traditionally be understood as ``seasonal'' employees.The period to be used for calculating whether a worker has worked ``anaverage of fewer than 20 hours per week'' is the shorter of the actualtime the worker has been employed or the most recent 90 days.(i) <T3>Single site of employment</T3>. (1) A single site of employment canrefer to either a single location or a group of contiguous locations. Groupsof structures which form a campus or industrial park, or separate facilitiesacross the street from one another, may be considered a single site ofemployment.(2) There may be several single sites of employment within a single building,such as an office building, if separate employers conduct activities withinsuch a building. For example, an office building housing 50 different businesseswill contain 50 single sites of employment. The offices of each employerwill be its single site of employment.(3) Separate buildings or areas which are not directly connected or inimmediate proximity may be considered a single site of employment if theyare in reasonable geographic proximity, used for the same purpose, andshare the same staff and equipment. An example is an employer who managesa number of warehouses in an area but who regularly shifts or rotates thesame employees from one building to another.(4) Non-contiguous sites in the same geographic area which do not sharethe same staff or operational purpose should not be considered a singlesite. For example, assembly plants which are located on opposite sidesof a town and which are managed by a single employer are separate sitesif they employ different workers.(5) Contiguous buildings owned by the same employer which have separatemanagement, produce different products, and have separate workforces areconsidered separate single sites of employment.(6) For workers whose primary duties require travel from point to point,who are outstationed, or whose primary duties involve work outside anyof the employer's regular employment sites (e.g., railroad workers, busdrivers, salespersons), the single site of employment to which they areassigned as their home base, from which their work is assigned, or to whichthey report will be the single site in which they are covered for WARNpurposes.(7) Foreign sites of employment are not covered under WARN. U.S. workersat such sites are counted to determine whether an employer is covered asan employer under andSection; 639.3(a).(8) The term ``single site of employment'' may also apply to truly unusualorganizational situations where the above criteria do not reasonably apply.The application of this definition with the intent to evade the purposeof the Act to provide notice is not acceptable.(j) <T3>Facility or operating unit. </T3>The term ``facility'' refers to abuilding or buildings. The term ``operating unit'' refers to an organizationallyor operationally distinct product, operation, or specific work functionwithin or across facilities at the single site.(k) <T3>State dislocated worker unit. </T3>The term ``State dislocated workerunit'' means a unit designated or created in each State by the Governorunder Title III of the Job Training Partnership Act, as amended by EDWAA.(l) <T3>State. </T3>For the purpose of WARN, the term ``State'' includes the50 States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, andthe U.S. Virgin Islands.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;639.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Who must give notice?</ITAG>Section 3(a) of WARN states that ``an employer shall not order a plantclosing or mass layoff until the end of a 60-day period after the employerserves written notice of such an order * * *.'' Therefore, an employerwho is anticipating carrying out a plant closing or mass layoff is requiredto give notice to affected employees or their representative(s), the Statedislocated worker unit and the chief elected official of a unit of localgovernment. (See definitions in andSection;639.3 of this part.)(a) It is the responsibility of the employer to decide the most appropriateperson within the employer's organization to prepare and deliver the noticeto affected employees or their representative(s), the State dislocatedworker unit and the chief elected official of a unit of local government.In most instances, this may be the local site plant manager, the localpersonnel director or a labor relations officer.(b) An employer who has previously announced and carried out a short-termlayoff (6 months or less) which is being extended beyond 6 months due tobusiness circumstances (including unforeseeable changes in price or cost)not reasonably foreseeable at the time of the initial layoff is requiredto give notice when it becomes reasonably foreseeable that the extensionis required. A layoff extending beyond 6 months from the date the layoffcommenced for any other reason shall be treated as an employment loss fromthe date of its commencement.(c) In the case of the sale of part or all of a business, section 2(b)(1)of WARN defines who the ``employer'' is. The seller is responsible forproviding notice of any plant closing or mass layoff which takes placeup to and including the effective date (time) of the sale, and the buyeris responsible for providing notice of any plant closing or mass layoffthat takes place thereafter. Affected employees are always entitled tonotice; at all times the employer is responsible for providing notice.(1) If the seller is made aware of any definite plans on the part of thebuyer to carry out a plant closing or mass layoff within 60 days of purchase,the seller may give notice to affected employees as an agent of the buyer,if so empowered. If the seller does not give notice, the buyer is, nevertheless,responsible to give notice. If the seller gives notice as the buyer's agent,the responsibility for notice still remains with the buyer.(2) It may be prudent for the buyer and seller to determine the impactsof the sale on workers, and to arrange between them for advance noticeto be given to affected employees or their representative(s), if a masslayoff or plant closing is planned.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;639.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">When must notice be given?</ITAG>(a) <T3>General rule. </T3>(1) With certain exceptions discussed in paragraphs(b), (c) and (d) of this section and in andSection;639.9 of this part, noticemust be given at least 60 calendar days prior to any planned plant closingor mass layoff, as defined in these regulations. When all employees arenot terminated on the same date, the date of the first individual terminationwithin the statutory 30-day or 90-day period triggers the 60-day noticerequirement. A worker's last day of employment is considered the date ofthat worker's layoff. The first and each subsequent group of termineesare entitled to a full 60 days' notice. In order for an employer to decidewhether issuing notice is required, the employer should_(i) Look ahead 30 days and behind 30 days to determine whether employmentactions both taken and planned will, in the aggregate for any 30-day period,reach the minimum numbers for a plant closing or a mass layoff and thustrigger the notice requirement; and(ii) Look ahead 90 days and behind 90 days to determine whether employmentactions both taken and planned each of which separately is not of sufficientsize to trigger WARN coverage will, in the aggregate for any 90-day period,reach the minimum numbers for a plant closing or a mass layoff and thustrigger the notice requirement. An employer is not, however, required undersection 3(d) to give notice if the employer demonstrates that the separateemployment losses are the result of separate and distinct actions and causes,and are not an attempt to evade the requirements of WARN.(2) The point in time at which the number of employees is to be measuredfor the purpose of determining coverage is the date the first notice isrequired to be given. If this ``snapshot'' of the number of employees employedon that date is clearly unrepresentative of the ordinary or average employmentlevel, then a more representative number can be used to determine coverage.Examples of unrepresentative employment levels include cases when the levelis near the peak or trough of an employment cycle or when large upwardor downward shifts in the number of employees occur around the time noticeis to be given. A more representative number may be an average number ofemployees over a recent period of time or the number of employees on analternative date which is more representative of normal employment levels.Alternative methods cannot be used to evade the purpose of WARN, and shouldonly be used in unusual circumstances.(b) <T3>Transfers. </T3>(1) Notice is not required in certain cases involvingtransfers, as described under the definition of ``employment loss'' atandSection;639.3(f) of this part.(2) An offer of reassignment to a different site of employment should notbe deemed to be a ``transfer'' if the new job constitutes a constructivedischarge.(3) The meaning of the term ``reasonable commuting distance'' will varywith local and industry conditions. In determining what is a ``reasonablecommuting distance'', consideration should be given to the following factors:geographic accessibility of the place of work, the quality of the roads,customarily available transportation, and the usual travel time.(4) In cases where the transfer is beyond reasonable commuting distance,the employer may become liable for failure to give notice if an offer totransfer is not accepted within 30 days of the offer or of the closingor layoff (whichever is later). Depending upon when the offer of transferwas made by the employer, the normal 60-day notice period may have expiredand the plant closing or mass layoff may have occurred. An employer is,therefore, well advised to provide 60-day advance notice as part of thetransfer offer.(c) <T3>Temporary employment.</T3> (1) No notice is required if the closingis of a temporary facility, or if the closing or layoff is the result ofthe completion of a particular project or undertaking, and the affectedemployees were hired with the understanding that their employment was limitedto the duration of the facility or the project or undertaking.(2) Employees must clearly understand at the time of hire that their employmentis temporary. When such understandings exist will be determined by referenceto employment contracts, collective bargaining agreements, or employmentpractices of an industry or a locality, but the burden of proof will liewith the employer to show that the temporary nature of the project or facilitywas clearly communicated should questions arise regarding the temporaryemployment understandings.(3) Employers in agriculture and construction frequently hire workers forharvesting, processing, or for work on a particular building or project.Such work may be seasonal but recurring. Such work falls under this exemptionif the workers understood at the time they were hired that their work wastemporary. In uncertain situations, it may be prudent for employers toclarify temporary work understandings in writing when workers are hired.The same employers may also have permanent employees who work on a varietyof jobs and tasks continuously through most of the calendar year. Suchemployees are not included under this exemption. Giving written noticethat a project is temporary will not convert permanent employment intotemporary work, making jobs exempt from WARN.(4) Certain jobs may be related to a specific contract or order. Whethersuch jobs are temporary depends on whether the contract or order is partof a long-term relationship. For example, an aircraft manufacturer hiresworkers to produce a standard airplane for the U.S. fleet under a contractwith the U.S. Air Force with the expectation that its contract will continueto be renewed during the foreseeable future. The employees of this manufacturerwould not be considered temporary.(d) <T3>Strikes or lockouts.</T3> The statute provides an exemption for strikesand lockouts which are not intended to evade the requirements of the Act.A lockout occurs when, for tactical or defensive reasons during the courseof collective bargaining or during a labor dispute, an employer lawfullyrefuses to utilize some or all of its employees for the performance ofavailable work. A lockout not related to collective bargaining which isintended as a subterfuge to evade the Act does not qualify for this exemption.A plant closing or mass layoff at a site of employment where a strike orlockout is taking place, which occurs for reasons unrelated to a strikeor lockout, is not covered by this exemption. An employer need not givenotice when permanently replacing a person who is deemed to be an economicstriker under the National Labor Relations Act. Non-striking employeesat the same single site of employment who experience a covered employmentloss as a result of a strike are entitled to notice; however, situationsin which a strike or lockout affects non-striking employees at the sameplant may constitute an unforeseeable business circumstance, as discussedin andSection;639.9, and reduced notice may apply. Similarly, the ``falteringcompany'' exception, also discussed in andSection;639.9 may apply in strikesituations. Where a union which is on strike represents more than one bargainingunit at the single site, non-strikers includes the non-striking bargainingunit(s). Notice also is due to those workers who are not a part of thebargaining unit(s) which is involved in the labor negotiations that ledto the lockout. Employees at other plants which have not been struck, butat which covered plant closings or mass layoffs occur as a direct or indirectresult of a strike or lockout are not covered by the strike/lockout exemption.The unforeseeable business circumstances exception to 60 days' notice alsomay apply to these closings or layoffs at other plants.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;639.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Who must receive notice?</ITAG>Section 3(a) of WARN provides for notice to each representative of theaffected employees as of the time notice is required to be given or, ifthere is no such representative at that time, to each affected employee.Notice also must be served on the State dislocated worker unit and thechief elected official of the unit of local government within which a closingor layoff is to occur. Section 2(b)(1) of the Act states that ``any personwho is an employee of the seller (other than a parttime employee) as ofthe effective date [time] of the sale shall be considered an employee ofthe purchaser immediately after the effective date [time] of the sale.''This provision preserves the notice rights of the employees of a businessthat has been sold, but creates no other employment rights. Although atechnical termination of the seller's employees may be deemed to have occurredwhen a sale becomes effective, WARN notice is only required where the employees,in fact, experience a covered employment loss.(a) <T3>Representative(s) of affected employees.</T3> Written notice is tobe served upon the chief elected officer of the exclusive representative(s)or bargaining agent(s) of affected employees at the time of the notice.If this person is not the same as the officer of the local union(s) representingaffected employees, it is recommended that a copy also be given to thelocal union official(s). (b) <T3>Affected employees.</T3> Notice is required to be given to employeeswho may reasonably be expected to experience an employment loss. This includesemployees who will likely lose their jobs because of bumping rights orother factors, to the extent that such workers can be identified at thetime notice is required to be given. If, at the time notice is requiredto be given, the employer cannot identify the employee who may reasonablybe expected to experience an employment loss due to the elimination ofa particular position, the employer must provide notice to the incumbentin that position. While part-time employees are not counted in determiningwhether plant closing or mass layoff thresholds are reached, such workersare due notice.(c) <T3>State dislocated worker unit.</T3> Notice is to be served upon theState dislocated worker unit. Since the States are restructuring to implementtraining under EDWAA, service of notice upon the State Governor constitutesservice upon the State dislocated worker unit until such time as the Governormakes public State procedures for serving notice to this unit.(d) <T3>Chief elected official of the unit of local government.</T3> The identityof the chief elected official will vary according to the local governmentstructure. In the case of elected boards, the notice is to be served uponthe board's chairperson.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;639.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">What must the notice contain?</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice must be specific.</T3> (1) All notice must be specific.(2) Where voluntary notice has been given more than 60 days in advance,but does not contain all of the required elements set out in this section,the employer must ensure that all of the information required by this sectionis provided in writing to the parties listed in andSection;639.6 at least60 days in advance of a covered employment action.(3) Notice may be given conditional upon the occurrence or nonoccurrenceof an event, such as the renewal of a major contract, only when the eventis definite and the consequences of its occurrence or nonoccurrence willnecessarily, in the normal course of business, lead to a covered plantclosing or mass layoff less than 60 days after the event. For example,if the non-renewal of a major contract will lead to the closing of theplant that produces the articles supplied under the contract 30 days afterthe contract expires, the employer may give notice at least 60 days inadvance of the projected closing date which states that if the contractis not renewed, the plant closing will occur on the projected date. Thenotice must contain each of the elements set out in this section.(4) The information provided in the notice shall be based on the best informationavailable to the employer at the time the notice is served. It is not theintent of the regulations, that errors in the information provided in anotice that occur because events subsequently change or that are minor,inadvertent errors are to be the basis for finding a violation of WARN.(b) As used in this section, the term ``date'' refers to a specific dateor to a 14-day period during which a separation or separations are expectedto occur. If separations are planned according to a schedule, the scheduleshould indicate the specific dates on which or the beginning date of each14-day period during which any separations are expected to occur. Wherea 14-day period is used, notice must be given at least 60 days in advanceof the first day of the period.(c) Notice to each representative of affected employees is to contain:(1) The name and address of the employment site where the plant closingor mass layoff will occur, and the name and telephone number of a companyofficial to contact for further information;(2) A statement as to whether the planned action is expected to be permanentor temporary and, if the entire plant is to be closed, a statement to thateffect;(3) The expected date of the first separation and the anticipated schedulefor making separations;(4) The job titles of positions to be affected and the names of the workerscurrently holding affected jobs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The notice may include additional information useful to the employeessuch as information on available dislocated worker assistance, and, ifthe planned action is expected to be temporary, the estimated duration,if known.(d) Notice to each affected employee who does not have a representativeis to be written in language understandable to the employees and is tocontain:(1) A statement as to whether the planned action is expected to be permanentor temporary and, if the entire plant is to be closed, a statement to thateffect;(2) The expected date when the plant closing or mass layoff will commenceand the expected date when the individual employee will be separated;(3) An indication whether or not bumping rights exist;(4) The name and telephone number of a company official to contact forfurther information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The notice may include additional information useful to the employeessuch as information on available dislocated worker assistance, and, ifthe planned action is expected to be temporary, the estimated duration,if known.(e) The notices separately provided to the State dislocated worker unitand to the chief elected official of the unit of local government are tocontain:(1) The name and address of the employment site where the plant closingor mass layoff will occur, and the name and telephone number of a companyofficial to contact for further information;(2) A statement as to whether the planned action is expected to be permanentor temporary and, if the entire plant is to be closed, a statement to thateffect;(3) The expected date of the first separation, and the anticipated schedulefor making separations;(4) The job titles of positions to be affected, and the number of affectedemployees in each job classification;(5) An indication as to whether or not bumping rights exist;(6) The name of each union representing affected employees, and the nameand address of the chief elected officer of each union.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The notice may include additional information useful to the employeessuch as a statement of whether the planned action is expected to be temporaryand, if so, its expected duration.(f) As an alternative to the notices outlined in paragraph (e) above, anemployer may give notice to the State dislocated worker unit and to the unit of local government by providing them with a written notice statingthe name of address of the employment site where the plant closing or masslayoff will occur; the name and telephone number of a company officialto contact for further information; the expected date of the first separation;and the number of affected employees. The employer is required to maintainthe other information listed in andSection; 639.7(e) on site and readilyaccessible to the State disclocated worker unit and to the unit of generallocal government. Should this information not be available when requested,it will be deemed a failure to give required notice.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">How is the notice served?</ITAG>Any reasonable method of delivery to the parties listed under andSection;639.6 of this part which is designed to ensure receipt of notice of least60 days before separation is acceptable (e.g., first class mail, personaldelivery with optional signed receipt). In the case of notification directlyto affected employees, insertion of notice into pay envelopes is anotherviable option. A ticketed notice, i.e., preprinted notice regularly includedin each employee's pay check or pay envelope, does not meet the requirementsof WARN.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">When may notice be given less than 60 days in advance?</ITAG>Section 3(b) of WARN sets forth three conditions under which the notificationperiod may be reduced to less than 60 days. The employer bears the burdenof proof that conditions for the exceptions have been met. If one of theexceptions is applicable, the employer must give as much notice as is practicableto the union, non-represented employees, the State dislocated worker unit,and the unit of local government and this may, in some circumstances, benotice after the fact. The employer must, at the time notice actually isgiven, provide a brief statement of the reason for reducing the noticeperiod, in addition to the other elements set out in andSection; 639.7.(a) The exception under section 3(b)(1) of WARN, termed ``faltering company'',applies to plant closings but not to mass layoffs and should be narrowlyconstrued. To qualify for reduced notice under this exception:(1) An employer must have been actively seeking capital or business atthe time that 60-day notice would have been required. That is, the employermust have been seeking financing or refinancing through the arrangementof loans, the issuance of stocks, bonds, or other methods of internallygenerated financing; or the employer must have been seeking additionalmoney, credit, or business through any other commercially reasonable method.The employer must be able to identify specific actions taken to obtaincapital or business.(2) There must have been a realistic opportunity to obtain the financingor business sought.(3) The financing or business sought must have been sufficient, if obtained,to have enabled the employer to avoid or postpone the shutdown. The employermust be able to objectively demonstrate that the amount of capital or thevolume of new business sought would have enabled the employer to keep thefacility, operating unit, or site open for a reasonable period of time.(4) The employer reasonably and in good faith must have believed that givingthe required notice would have precluded the employer from obtaining theneeded capital or business. The employer must be able to objectively demonstratethat it reasonably thought that a potential customer or source of financingwould have been unwilling to provide the new business or capital if noticewere given, that is, if the employees, customers, or the public were awarethat the facility, operating unit, or site might have to close. This conditionmay be satisfied if the employer can show that the financing or businesssource would not choose to do business with a troubled company or witha company whose workforce would be looking for other jobs. The actionsof an employer relying on the ``faltering company'' exception will be viewedin a company-wide context. Thus, a company with access to capital marketsor with cash reserves may not avail itself of this exception by lookingsolely at the financial condition of the facility, operating unit, or siteto be closed.(b) The ``unforeseeable business circumstances'' exception under section3(b)(2)(A) of WARN applies to plant closings and mass layoffs caused bybusiness circumstances that were not reasonably foreseeable at the timethat 60-day notice would have been required.(1) An important indicator of a business circumstance that is not reasonablyforeseeable is that the circumstance is caused by some sudden, dramatic,and unexpected action or condition outside the employer's control. A principalclient's sudden and unexpected termination of a major contract with theemployer, a strike at a major supplier of the employer, and an unanticipatedand dramatic major economic downturn might each be considered a businesscircumstance that is not reasonably foreseeable. A government ordered closingof an employment site that occurs without prior notice also may be an unforeseeablebusiness circumstance.(2) The test for determining when business circumstances are not reasonablyforeseeable focuses on an employer's business judgment. The employer mustexercise such commercially reasonable business judgment as would a similarlysituated employer in predicting the demands of its particular market. Theemployer is not required, however, to accurately predict general economicconditions that also may affect demand for its products or services.(c) The ``natural disaster'' exception in section 3(b)(2)(B) of WARN appliesto plant closings and mass layoffs due to any form of a natural disaster.(1) Floods, earthquakes, droughts, storms, tidal waves or tsunamis andsimilar effects of nature are natural disasters under this provision.(2) To qualify for this exception, an employer must be able to demonstratethat its plant closing or mass layoff is a direct result of a natural disaster.(3) While a disaster may preclude full or any advance notice, such noticeas is practicable, containing as much of the information required in andSection;639.7 as is available in the circumstances of the disaster still must begiven, whether in advance or after the fact of an employment loss causedby a natural disaster.(4) Where a plant closing or mass layoff occurs as an indirect result ofa natural disaster, the exception does not apply but the ``unforeseeablebusiness circumstance'' exception described in paragraph (b) of this sectionmay be applicable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 639.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">When may notice be extended?</ITAG>Additional notice is required when the date or schedule of dates of a plannedplant closing or mass layoff is extended beyond the date or the endingdate of any 14-day period announced in the original notice as follows:(a) If the postponement is for less than 60 days, the additional noticeshould be given as soon as possible to the parties identified in andSection;639.6 and should include reference to the earlier notice, the date (or14-day period) to which the planned action is postponed, and the reasonsfor the postponement. The notice should be given in a manner which willprovide the information to all affected employees.(b) If the postponement is for 60 days or more, the additional notice shouldbe treated as new notice subject to the provisions of andSection;andSection;639.5, 639.6 and 639.7 of this part. Rolling notice, in the sense of routineperiodic notice, given whether or not a plant closing or mass layoff isimpending, and with the intent to evade the purpose of the Act rather thangive specific notice as required by WARN, is not acceptable.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC this 13th day of April 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Elizabeth Dole,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-9376 Filed 4-19-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-30-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>